[6001]
(Imam Zain-ul-'Abidin) 'Ali b. Husain reported that when they came to Medina from Yazid b. Mu'awiya after the martyrdom of Husain b. 'Ali (Allah be pleased with him) Miswar b. Makhramah met him and said to him: Is there any work for me which you ask me to do? I said to him: No. He again said to me: Would you not give me the sword of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) for I fear that the people may snatch it from you? By Allah, if you give that to me, no one would be able to take it away, so long as there is life in me. Verily 'Ali b. Abi Talib sent a proposal of marriage to the daughter of Abu Jahl in spite of (the fact that his wife) Fatima (had been living in his house). Thereupon I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say while addressing the people on the pulpit. I was adolescing in those days. He said : Fatima is a part of me and I fear that she may be put to trial in regard to religion. He then made a mention of his son-in law who had been from the tribe of 'Abd Shams and praised his behaviour as a son-in-law and said: Whatever he said to me he told the truth and whatever he promised he fulfilled it for me. I am not going to declare forbidden what is lawful and make lawful what is forbidden, but, by Allah, the daaghter of Allah's Messenger and the daughter of the enemy of Allah can never be combined at one place.
[6002]
'Ali b. Husain reported that Miswar b. Makhramah informed him that 'Ali b. Abi Talib sent the proposal of marriage to the daughter of Abu Jahl as he had Fatima, the daughter of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), (as his wife). When Fatima heard about it, she came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and said: The people say that you never feel angry on account of your daughters and now 'Ali is going to marry the daughter of Abu Jahl. Makhramah said: Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) rose up and I heard him reciting Tashahhud and say: Now to the point. I gave a daughter of mine (Zainab) to Abu'l-'As b. Rabi, and he spoke to me and spoke the truth. Verily Fatima, the daughter of Muhammad, is a part of me and I do not approve that she may be put to any trial and by Allah, the daughter of Allah's Messenger cannot be combined with the daughter of God's enemy (as the co-wives) of one person. Thereupon 'Ali gave up (the idea of his intended) marriage. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters.
[6003]
'A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) called his daughter Fatima (during his last illness). He said. to her something secretly and she wept. He again said to her something secretly and she laughed. 'A'isha further reported that she said to Fatima: What is that which Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to you secretly and you wept and then said to you something secretly and you laughed? Thereupon she said: He informed me secretly of his death and so I wept. He then again informed me secretly that I would be the first amongst the members of his family to follow him and so I laughed.
[6004]
'A'isha reported: We, the wives of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), were with him (during his last illness) and none was absent therefrom that Fatima, who walked after the style of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), came there, and when he saw her he welcomed her saying: You are welcome, my daughter. He their made her sit on his right side or on his left side. Then he said something secretly to her and she wept bitterly and when he found her (plunged) in grief he said to her something secretly for the second time and she laughed. I ('A'isha) said to her: Allah's Messenger has singled you amongst the women (of the family) for talking (to you something secretly) and you wept. When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) recovered from illness, I said to her. What did Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say to you? Thereupon she said: I am not going to disclose the secret of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) died, I said to her: I adjure you by the right that I have upon you that you should narrate to me what Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to you. She said: Yes, now I can do that (so listen to it). When he talked to me secretly for the first time he informed me that Gabirel was in the habit of reciting the Qur'an along with him once or twice every year, but this year it had been twice and so he perceived his death quite near, so fear Allah and be patient (and he told me) that he would be a befitting forerunner for me and so I wept as you saw me. And when he saw me in grief he talked to me secretly for the second time and said: Fatima, are you not pleased that you should be at the head of the believing women or the head of this Umma ? I laughed and it was that laughter which you saw.
[6005]
'A'isha reported that all the wives of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) had gathered (in her apartment) during the days of his (Prophet's) last illness and no woman was left behind that Fatima, who walked after the style of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), came there. He welcomed her by saying: You are welcome, my daughter, and made her sit on his right side or on his left side, and then talked something secretly to her and Fitima wept. Then he talked something secretly to her and she laughed. I said to her: What makes you weep? She said; I am not going to divulge the secret of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). I ('A'isha) said: I have not seen (anything happening) like today, the happiness being more close to grief (as I see today) when she wept. I said to her: Has Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) singled you out for saying something leaving us aside? She then wept and I asked her what he said, and she said: I am not going to divulge the secrets of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). And when he died I again asked her and she said that he (the Holy Prophet) told her: Gabriel used to recite the Qur'an to me once a year and for this year it was twice and so I perceived that my death had drawn near, and that I ('A'isha) would be the first amongst the members of his family who would meet him (in the Hereafter). He shall be my good forerunner and it made me weep. He again talked to me secretly (saying): Arn't you pleased that you should be the sovereign amongst the believing women or the head of women of this Umma? And this made me laugh.
[6006]
Salman reported: In case it lies in your power don't be one to enter the bazar first and the last to get out of that because there is a bustle and the standard of Satan is set there. He said: I was informed that Gabriel (Allah be pleased with him) came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and there was with him Umin Salama and he began to talk with him. He then stood up, whereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said to Umm Salama: (Do you know) who was he and what did he say? She said: He was Dihya (Kalbi). He reported Umm Salama having said: By Allah, I did not deem him but only he (Dihya) until I heard the address of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) informing him about us. He (the narrator) said: I said to Uthman: From whom did you hear it? He said: From Usima b. Zaid.
[6007]
'A'isha, the Mother of the Faithful, reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: One who has the longest hands amongst you would meet me most immediately. She farther said: They (the wives of Allah's Apostle) used to measure the hands as to whose hand was the longest and it was the hand of Zainab that was the longest amongst them, as she used to work with her hand and Spend (that income) on charity.
[6008]
Anas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) went to Umm Aiman and I went along with him and she served him a drink in a vessel and he reported that the narrator said: I do not know whether it was because of the fasting (or for any other reason) that he (the Holy Prophet) refused to accept that. She raised her voice and showed annoyance to him.
[6009]
Anas reported that after the death of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) Abu Bakr said to 'Umar: Let us visit Umm Aiman as Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to visit her. As we came to her, she wept. They (Abu Bakr and Umar) said to her: What makes you weep? What is in store (in the next world) for Allah's-Messenger (may peace be upon him) is better than (this worldly life). She said : I weep not because I am ignorant of the fact that what is in store for Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) (in the next world) is better than (this world), but I weep because the revelation which came from the Heaven has ceased to come. This moved both of them to tears and they began to weep along with her.
[6010]
Anas reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) did not enter the house of any woman except that of his wives and that of Umm Sulaim. He used to visit her. It was said to him why it was so, whereupon he said: I feel great compassion for her. Her brother was killed while he was with me.
[6011]
Anas reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: I entered Paradise and heard the noise of steps. I said: Who is it ? They said: She is Ghumaisa, daughter of Milhan, the mother of Anas b. Malik.
[6012]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: I was shown Paradise and I saw the wife of Abu Talha (i.e. Umm Sulaim) and I heard the noise of steps before me and, lo, it was that of Bilal.
[6013]
Anas reported that the son of Abu Talba who was born of Umm Sulaim died. She (Umm Sulaim) said to the members of her family : Do not narrate to Abu Talha about his son until I narrate it to him. Abu Talha came (home); she presented to him the supper. He took it and drank water. She then embellished herself which she did not do before. He (Abu Talha) had a sexual intercourse with her and when she saw that he was satisfied after sexual intercourse with her, she said: Abu Talha, if some people borrow something from another family and then (the members of the family) ask for its return, would they resist its return? He said: No. She said: I inform you about the death of your son. He was annoyed, and said : You did not inform me until I had a sexual intercourse with you and you later on gave me information about my son. He went to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and informed him what had happened. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: May Allah bless both of you in the night spent by you! He (the narrator) said: She became pregnant. Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) was in the course of a journey and she was along with him and when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came back to Medina from the journey he did not enter (his house) (during the night). When the people came near Medina, she felt the pangs of delivery. He (Abu Talha) remained with her and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) proceeded on. Abu Talha said: O Lord, you know that I love to go along with Allah's Messenger when he goes out and enter along with him when he enters and I have been detained as Thou seest. Umm Sulaim said: Abu Talha, I do not feel (so much pain) as I was feeling formerly, so better proceed on. So we proceeded on and she felt the pangs of delivery as they reached (Medina) and a child was born and my mother said to me: Anas, none should suckle him until you go to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) tomorrow morning. And when it was morning I carried him (the child) and went along with him to Allah's Messenger (may peace beupon him). He said: I saw that he had in his hand the instrument for the cauterisation of the camels. When he saw me. he said: This is, perhaps, what Umm Sulaim has given birth to. I said: Yes. He laid down that instrument on the ground. I brought that child to him and placed it in his lap and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) asked Ajwa dates of Medina to be brought and softened them in his month. When these had become palatable he placed them in the mouth of that child. The child began to taste them. Then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: See what love the Ansar have for dates. He then wiped his face and named him 'Abdullah.
[6014]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Anas b. Malik through another chain of transmitters.
[6015]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to Bilal: Bilal, narrate to me which act at the time of morning prayer you did in Islam for which you hope to receive good reward, for I heard during the night the sound of your steps before me in Paradise. Bilal said: I did not do any act in Islam for which I hope to get any benefit but this that when I perform complete ablution during the night or day I observe prayer with that purification what Allah has ordained for me to pray.
[6016]
Abdullah reported that when this verse was revealed: "There is no harm on persons who believe and perform good acts, what they had eaten (formerly) when they avoided it (now) and they affirmed their faith" (v. 93) up to the end. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to me: You are one amongst them.
[6017]
Abu Musa reported: When I and my brother came from Yemen we used to consider Ibn Mas'ud and his mother amongst the members of the household. of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) because of their visiting them frequently and staying there for long (periods of) time.
[6018]
Abu Musa. reported: I came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and thought that 'Abdullah was amongst the members of the family, or like that.
[6019]
Abu Ishaq reported that he heard Abu'l-Ahwas say: I was along with Abu Musa and Abu Mas'ud as Ibn Mas'ud died and one of them said to the other: Do you find one like him besides him? Thereupon he said: Do you say this (no one can be his rival)? He was admitted (to the company of the Holy Prophet) whereas we were detained and he had been present in the company of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) whereas we had been absent.
[6020]
Abu Ahwas reported: We were in the house of Abu Musa along with some of the companions of 'Abdullah and they were looking at the Holy Book. 'Abdullah stood up, whereupon Abu Mas'ud said: I do not know whether Allah's Messenger, (may peace be upon him) has left after him one having a better knowledge (of Islam) than the man who is standing. Abu Musa said: If you say this, that is correct, because he had been present when we had been absent and he was permitted when we were detained.
[6021]
Zaid b. Wahab reported: I was sitting along with Hudhaifa and Abu Musa, and the rest of the hadith is the same.
[6022]
'Abdullah (b. Mas'ud) reported that he (said to his companions to conceal their copies of the Qur'an) and further said: He who conceals anything he shall have to bring that which he had concealed on the Day of judgment, and then said: After whose mode of recitation you command me to recite? I in fact recited before AIlah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) more than seventy chapters of the Qur'an and the Companions of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) know it that I have better understanding of the Book of Allah (than they do), and if I were to know that someone had better understanding than I, I would have gone to him. Shaqiq said: I sat in the company of the Companions of Mubkmmad (may peace be upon him) but I did not hear anyone having rejected that (that is, his recitation) or finding fault with it.
[6023]
Abdullah reported: By Him besides Whom there is no god, there is no chapter in the Book of Allah about which I do not know as to where it was revealed and there is no verse about which I do not know in what context it was revealed, and if I were to know of one having a better understanding of the Book of Allah than I (and I could reach him) on the back of the mule, I would have definitely gone to him on camel's back.
[6024]
Masruq reported: We used to go to Abdullah b. 'Amr and talk to him, Ibn Numair said: One day we made a mention of Abdullah b. Mas'ud, whereupon he said: You have made mention of a person whom I love more than anything else. I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Learn Qur'an from four persons: Ibn Umm 'Abd (i.e. 'Abdullah b. Mas'ud) he started from him-then Mu'adh b. Jabal and Ubayya b. Ka'b, then Salim the ally of Abu Hudhaifa.
[6025]
Masruq reported: We were in the company of Abdullah b 'Amr that we made a mention of a hadith from Abdullah b. Mas'ud; thereupon he said: That is a person whose love ever remains (fresh in my heart) after I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Learn Qur'an from four persons: Ibn Umm 'Abd, i e. Abdullah b. Mas'ud and he started from his name-then Ubayy b. Ka'b and Mu'adh b Jabal. Zuhri did not make a mention of the words yaquluhu in his narration
[6026]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Abu Bakr b. Abu Shaiba and Abu Kuraib, and both of them said: Abu Mu'awiya narrated to us from A'mash on the authority of Jarir and Waki', and in a narration of Abu Bakr transmitted on the authority of Abu Mu'awiya the mention of Mu'adh has preceded Ubayy's, and in the narration transmitted on the authority of Abu Kuraib, the name of Ubayy preceded Mu'ddh's. This tradition has been transmitted on the authority of Shulba through A'mash, but there is a difference of order of the four.
[6027]
Masruq reported: They made a mention of Ibn Mas'ud before 'Abdullah b. Amr, whereupon he said: He is a person whose love is always fresh in my heart after I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Learn the recita- tion of the Qur'an from four persons: from Ibn Mas'ud, Salim, the ally of Abu Hudhaifa, Ubayy b. Ka'b, Mu'adh b. Jabal.
[6028]
Ubaidullah b. Mu'adh reported it on the authority of his father Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters and he made this addition. He made a mention of these two names but I do not know whose name he mentioned first.
[6029]
Anas is reported to have said: Four persons collected the Qur'an during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and all of them were Ansar: Mu'adh b. Jabal, Ubayy b. Ka'b, Zaid b. Thabit, Abu Zaid. Qatada said: Anas, who was Abu Zaid? He said: He was one of my uncles.
[6030]
Hammam said: I said to Anas b. Malik: Who collected the Qur'an during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) ? He said: Four (persons), all of them belonging to Ansir: Ubayy b. Ka'b, Mu'adh b. Jabal, Zaid b. Thabit and a person from the Ansar whose Kunya was Abu Zaid.
[6031]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to Ubayy: Verily Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, has commanded me to recite the Qur'an to you, whereupon he said: (Has) Allah mentioned my name to you ? He said: Allah has mentioned your name to me. Thereupon he began to shed tears (of joy)
[6032]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to Ubayy b. Ka'b: I have been commanded to recite to you the Sura (al- Bayyinah) which opens with these words (Lam Yakunil-ladhiyna Kafaruu) He said: Has he mentioned to you my name ? He said: Yes; thereupon he shed tears of joy. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Anas through another chain of transmitters.
[6033]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying while the bier of Sa'd b. Mu'adh was placed before them : The Throne of the most Gracious shook at the death of Sa'd b. Mu'adh.
[6034]
Jabir reported that the Throne of the most Compassionate shook because of the death of Sa'd b. Mu'adh.
[6035]
Anas b. Malik reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as say- ing : That his bier (that of Sa'd) was placed (before them) and the Throne of the most Compassionate shook.
[6036]
Al-Bara' reported that a garment of silk was presented to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). His Companions touched it and admired its softness ; there- upon he said : Do you admire the softness of this (cloth) ? The handkerchiefs of Sa'd b. Mu'adh in Paradise are better than this.
[6037]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Anas b. Malik through another chain of transmitters.
[6038]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Shu'ba combining the two chains of transmitters. Anas b Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was presented a garment of sundus and he prohibited the use of silk. The persons admired it, whereupon he said: By Him in Whose Hand is the life of Muhammad, the kerchiefs of Sa'd b. Mu'adh in Paradise are better than this.
[6039]
Anas reported the king of Dumat al-Jandal presented to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) the garment and lie made no mention (of the fact) that he prohibited the use of silk.
[6040]
Anas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) took hold of his sword on the Day of Uhud and said: Who would take it from me? All the persons stretched their hands saying: I would do it, I would do it. He (Allah's Apostle) said: Who would take it in order to fulfil its rights? Then the people withdrew their hands. Simak b. Kharasha Abu Dujana said: I am here to take it and fulfil its rights. He took it and struck the heads of the polytheists.
[6041]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: The dead body of my father was brought and he was covered (with cloth) and it had been mutilated. I made an attempt to lift the cloth, but my people prohibited me to do so. I again made an attempt to lift the cloth, but my people prohibited me. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) lifted it or he commanded it to be lifted. He heard the noise (of a loud) weeping, or the noise of a woman mourner. He inquired who she was. They said: The daughter of 'Amr or the sister of Amr, whereupon he said: Why does she weep? The Angels provide him shade with the help of their Wings until he would be lifted (to his heavenly abode)
[6042]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: My father fell as a martyr on the Day of Uhud and I attempted to uncover his face and weep, but they (the Companions of the Holy Prophet) forbade me to do this, whereas Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) did not forbid me and Fatima bint Amr, the sister of my father, was also weeping There- upon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: You may weep or you may not weep; the Angels provide him shade with the help of their wings until you lift him (to be buried in the grave).
[6043]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Jabir through another chain of transmitters, but with this difference that there is no mention of the Angels and the weeping of a female mourner.
[6044]
Jabir reported: My father was brought in a state that his ears had been cut off and (his dead body) was placed before Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) , the rest of the hadith is the same.
[6045]
Abu Barza reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) was there in a battlefield that Allah conferred upon him the spoils of war. He said to his Companions: Is anyone missing amongst you? They said: So and so and so. He again said: Is there anyone missing amongst you? They said: So and so and so. He then said: Is there anyone missing amongst you? They said: No. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: But I am missing Julaibib. They (his Companions) searched him amongst those who had been killed and they found him by the side of seven (dead bodies) whom he had killed and he had been killed (by the oppoments). Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) came there and stood (by his side) and said: He killed seven (persons). Then (his opponents) killed him. He is mine and I am his. He then placed him upon his hands and there was none else to lift but Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). Then the grave was dug for him and he was placed in the grave and no mention is made of a bath.
[6046]
'Abdullah b. Samit reported that Abu Dharr said: We set out from our tribe Ghafir who look upon the prohibited months as permissible months. I and my brother Unais and our mother stayed with our maternal uncle who treated us well. The men of his tribe fell jealous and they said: When you are anay from your house, Unais commits adultery with your wife. Our -naternal uncle came and he accused us of the sin which was conveyed to him. I said: You have undone the good you did to us. We cannot stay with you after this. We came to our camels and loaded (our) luggage. Our maternal uncle began to weep covering himself with (a piece of) cloth. We proceeded on until we encamped by the side of Mecca. Unais cast lot on the camels (we had) and an equal number (above that). They both went to a Kahin and he made Unais win and Unais came with our camels and an equal number along with them. He (Abu Dharr) said: My nephew, I used to observe prayer three years before my meeting with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). I said: For whom did you say prayer? He said: For Allah. I said : To which direction did you turn your face (for observing prayer) ? He said: I used to turn my face as Allah has directed me to turn my face. I used to observe the night prayer at the time of the end of night and I fell down in prostration like the mantle until the sun rose over me. Unais said: I have a work in Mecca, so you better stay here. Unais went until he came to Mecca and he came to me late. I said: What did you do ? He said: I met a person in Mecca who is on your religion and he claims that verily it is Allah Who has sent him. I said: What do the people say about him? He said: They say that he is a poet or a Kahin or a magician. Unais who was himself one of the poets said. I have heard the words of a Kahin but his words in no way resemble his (words). And I also compared his words to the verses of poets but such words cannot be uttered by any poet. By Allah, he is truthful and they are liars. Then I said: you stay here, until I go, so that I should see him. He said : I came to Mecca and I selected an insignificant person from amongst them and said to him: Where is he whom you call as-Sabi ? He pointed out towards me saying: He is Sabi. Thereupon the people of the valley attacked me with sods and bows until I fell down unconscious. I stood up after havin. regained my consciousness and I found as if I was a red idol. I came to Zamzarn and washed blood from me and drank water from it and listen, O son of my brother, I stayed there for thirty nights or days and there was no food for me but the water of Zamzarn. And I became so bulky that there appeared wrinkles upon my stomach, and I did not feel any hunger in my stomach. It was during this time that the people of Mecca slept in the moonlit night and none was there to eircumambulate the House but only two women who had been invoking the name of Isafa, and Na'ila (the two idols). They came to me while in their circuit and I said: Marry one with the other, but they did not dissuade from their invoking. They came to me and I said to them : Insert wood (in the idols' private parts). (I said this to them in such plain words) as I could not express in metaphorical terms. These women went away crying and saying: Had there been one amongst our people (he would have taught a lesson to you for the obscene words used for our idols before us). These women met Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and Abu Bakr who had also been coming down the hill. He asked them: What has happened to you? They said: There is Sabi, who has hidden himself between the Ka'ba and its curtain. He said: What did he say to you? They said: He uttered such words before us as we cannot express. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came and he kissed the Black Stone and circumambulated the House along with his Companion and then observed prayer, and when he had finished his prayer, Abu Dharr said: I was the first to greet him with the salutation of peace and uttered (these words) in this way; Allah's Messen- ger, may there be peace upon you, whereupon he said: It may be upon you too and the mercy of Allah. He then said: Who are you ? I said: From the tribe of Ghifar. He leaned his hand and placed his finger on his forehead and I said to myself: Perhaps he has not liked it that I belong to the tribe of Ghifar. I attempted to catch hold of his hand but his friend who knew about him more than I dissuaded me f rom doing so. He then lifted his head and said: Since how long have you been here? I said: I have been here for the last thirty nights or days. He said: Who has been feeding you ? I said: There has been no food for me but the water of Zamzam. I have grown so bulky that there appear wrinkles upon my stomach and I do not feel any hunger. He said: It is blessed (water) and it also serves as food. Thereupon Abu Bakr said: Allah's Messenger, let me serve as a host to him for tonight, and then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) proceeded forth and so did Abu Bakr and I went along with them. Abu Bakr opened the door and then he brought for us the raisins of Ta'if and that was the first food which I ate there. Then I stayed as long as I had to stay. I then came to Allah's Messenaer (may peace be upon him) and he said: I have been shown the land abound- ing in trees and I think it cannot be but that of Yathrib (that is the old name of Medina). You are a preacher to your people on my behalf. I hope Allah would benefit them through you and He would reward you. I came to Unais and he said: What have you done ? I said: I have done that I have embraced Islam and I have testified (to the prophethood of Allah's Messenger). He said: I have no aversion for your religion and I also embrace Islam and testify (to the prophethood of Muhammad). Then both of us came to our mother and she said: I have no aversion for your religion and I also embrace Islam and testify to the prophethood of Muhammad. We then loaded our camels and came to our tribe Ghifir and half of the tribe embraced Islam and their chief was Aimi' b. Rahada Ghifirl and he was their leader and hall of the tribe said: We will embrace Islam when Allah's Messenger (may p,.ace be upon him) would come to Medina, and when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to Medina the remaining half also embraced Islam. Then a tribe Aslam came to the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger, we also embrace Islam like our brothers who have embraced Islam. And they also embraced Islam. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Allah granted pardon to the tribe of Ghifar and Allah saved (from destruction) the tribe of Aslam.
[6047]
This hadlth has been narrated on the authority of Humaid b. Hilal with the same chain of transmitters but with this addition: "As I came to Mecca, Unais said: (Well), go but be on your guard against the Meccans for they are his enemies and are annoyed with him."
[6048]
Abdullah b. Samit reported that Abu Dharr said: Son of my brother, I used to observe prayer two years before the advent of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). I said: To which direction did you turn your face? He said: To which Allah directed me to turn my face. The rest of the hadith is the same but with this addition that they went to a Kahin and his brother Unais began to praise him until he (in verses declared) him (Unais) as winner (in the contest of poetry), and so we got his camels, mixed them with our camels, and there is in this hadith also these words that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) came there and he circumambulated the House and observed two Rak'ahs of prayer behind the Station (of Ibrahim). I came to him and I was the first amongst persons to greet him with Assalam-o-'Alaikum, and I said to Allah's Messenger Let there be peace upon you. And he said: Let there be peace upon you too; who are you? And in the hadith (these words are) also found: Since how long have you been here ? And Abu Bakr said: Let him be my guest tonight.
[6049]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that when Abu Dharr heard of the advent of the Apostle (may peace be upon him) in Mecca he said: Brother, ride in this valley and bring information for me about the person who claims that there comes to him information from the Heavens. Listen to his words and then come to me. So he rode on until he came to Mecca and he heard his words (the sacred words of the Holy Prophet) and then came back to Abu Dharr and said: I have seen him exhorting (people) to develop good morals and his expressions can in no way be termed as poetry. He (Abu Dharr) said: I have not been satisfied with it regarding that which I had in my mind (as I sent you). So he took up provisions for the journey and a small water-skin con- taining water (and set forth) until he came to Mecca. He came to the mosque (Ka'ba) and began to find out Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and he did not re- cognise him (the Holy Prophet) and he did not even like that he should ask about him from anyone until it was night, and he slept. 'All saw him and found him to be a stranger. So he went with him. He followed hive but one did not make any inquiry from the other about anything until it was morning. He then brought the water and his provisions to the mosque and spent a day there, but he did not see Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) until it was night. He then returned to his bed that there happened to pass 'Ali and he said: This man has not been able to find his destination until this time. He made him stand and he went with him and no one made an in- quiry from his companion about anything. And when it was the third day he did the same. 'Ali made him stand up and brought him along with him. He said: By Him, besides Whom there is no god, why don't you tell me (the reason) which brought you here to this town? He said: (I shall do this) provided you hold me promise and a covenant that you would guide me aright. He then did that. He ('Ali) said : Verily, he Is truthful and he is a Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and when it is morning, follow me and if I would say anything from which I would sense fear about you I would stand (in a manner) as if I was throwing water and if I move on, you then follow me until I get in (some house). He did that and I followed him until he came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). He entered (the house) of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) along with him and listened to his words and embraced Islam at his very place. Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said to him: Go to your people and inform them until my command reaches you. Thereupon he said: By Him in Whose Hand is my life, I shall say to the people of Mecca this thing at the top of my voice So he set forth until he came to the mosque and then spoke at the top of his voice (saying):I bear testimony to the fact that there is no god but Allah and that Muhammad is the Messenger of Allah. The people attacked him and made him fall down when 'Abbas came and he leaned over him and said: Woe be upon you, don't you know that he is from amongst the tribe of Ghifar and your trad- ing route to Syria passes through (the settlements of this tribe), and he rescued him. He (Abu Dharr) did the same on the next day and they (the Meccans) again attacked him and Abbas leaned upon him and he rescued him.
[6050]
(6050) Jarir b. 'Abdullah said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) never refused me permission to see him since I embraced Islam and never looked at me but with a smile.
[6051]
Jarir reported: Since I embraced Islam Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) never refused to see me and he did not see me but with a smile on his face. Ibn Numair has made this addition to this hadith which has been reported on the authority of Ibn Idris that he (Jarir) made this complaint to him (to the Holy Prophet): I cannot sit upon the horse with firmness, whereupon he (Allah's Apostle) struck his chest with his hand and prayed: O Allah, make him steadfast and rightly-guided.
[6052]
Jabir reported that there was in pre-Islamic days a temple called Dhu'l- Khalasah and it was called the Yamanite Ka'ba or the northern Ka'ba. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said unto me: Will you rid me of Dhu'l-Khalasah and so I went forth at the head of 350 horsemen of the tribe of Ahmas and we destroyed it and killed whomsoever we found there. Then we came back to him (to the Holy Prophet) and informed him and he blessed us and the tribe of Ahmas.
[6053]
Jarir b. 'Abdullah al-Bajali said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to me: Can't on rid me of Dhu'I-Khalasah, the idol-house of Khath'am, and this idol-house was called the Yamanite Ka'ba. So I went along with 150 horsemen and I could not sit with steadfastness upon the horse. I made the mention of it to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and he struck his hand on my chest and said: O Allah, grant him steadfastness and make him the guide of righteousness and the rightly-guided one. So he went away and he set fire to it. Then Jarir sent some person to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) whose Kunya was Abu Arta to give him the happy news about that. He came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: I have not come to you (but with the news) that we have left Dhu'l-Khalasah as a scabed camel. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) blessed the horses of Ahmas and the men of their tribe five times.
[6054]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ismail with different chains of transmitters and in the badith transmitted on the authority of Marwan (the words are): "A person giving the glad tidings on behalf of Jarir came or Abu Husain b. Rabi'a came in order to give glad tidings to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him).
THE MERITS OF 'ABDULLAH B. ABBAS (ALLAH BE PLEASED WITH HIM) Chapter 30 :
[6055]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to privy and I placed for him water for ablution, When he came out he said: Who placed it here? And in a version of Zuhair they (the Companions) said, and in the version of Abu Bakr (the words are): I said: It is Ibn 'Abbas (who has done that), whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: May Allah grant him deep understanding of religion .
[6056]
Ibn 'Umar reported: I saw in a state of sleep as if I have in my hand a piece of silk cloth and there is no place in the Paradise where I intend to reach but that piece of cloth does not fly towards it. I made a mention of it to Hafsa (the sister of Ibn 'Umar) and Hafsa made a mention of it to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), whereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: I find 'Abdullah b 'Umar a pious person.
[6057]
Ibn 'Umar reported that when a person saw anything in sleep during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) he narrated it to Allah's Messenger, and I also had a longing that I should also see in a dream something which I should narrate to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and I was at that time an unmarried young man. I was sleeping in the mosque during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) tl)at I saw in a dream as if two Angels have taken hold of me and they have carried me to the fire, and, lo, it was built like the easing of a well and had two pillars like those of a well; and, lo, there were people in it whom I knew and I cried out : I seek refuge with Allah from Hell-fire; I seek refuge with Allah from Hell-fire. Then another Angel joined the two others, and said unto me : You need not fear I narrated this dream to llafsa and she narrated it to Allah's Messenger, whereupon Allah's Apostle said: Worthy is this man Abdullah, O that he would pray at night, and Silim added that Abdullah afterwards slept only but for a small part of the night.
[6058]
Ibn Umar reported: I used to spend nights in the mosque and by that time I had no wife and children. I saw in a dream as if I am being taken to a well. I made a mention of it to Allah's Messenger (may peacebe upon him). The rest of the hadith is the same.
[6059]
Anas reported that Umm Sulaim said (to the Holy Prophet) Allah's Messenger, here is your servant Anas, invoke blessings of Allah upon him. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: O Allah, make an increase in his wealth, and progeny, and confer blessings upon him in everything Thou hast bestowed upon him.
[6060]
Anas reported (that his mother) Umm Sulaim said (to the Holy Prophet) Allah's Messenger, here is your servant Anas. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[6061]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Anas through another chain of transmitters.
[6062]
Anas reportedAllah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) visited us and there was none else (in the house) but I, my mother and my mother's sister Umm Haram. My mother said to him : Allah's Messenger, here is a small servant of yours, invoke blessings of Allah upon him. And he invoked blessings for me (that I should be bestowed upon) every good and this was what he (said) at the end of what be supplicated for me: O Allah, make an increase in his wealth, and progeny, and cqnfer blessings (upon him) in (each one) of them.
[6063]
Anas reported: My mother Umm Anas came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). And she prepared my lower garment out of the half of her headdress and (with the other half) she covered my upper body and said: Allah's Messenger, here is my son Unais; I have brought him to you for serving you. Invoke blessings of Allah upon him. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: O Allah, make an increase in his wealth, and progeny. Anas said : By Allah, my fortune is huge and my children, and grand-children are now more than one hundred.
[6064]
Anas b. Malik said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) passed (by our house) that my mother Umm Sulaim listened to his voice and said: Allah's Messenger, let my father and mother be sacrificed for thee, here is Unais (and requested him to invoke blessings upon me). So Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) invoked three blessings upon me. I have seen (the results) of the two in this very world (in regard to wealth and progeny) and I hope to see (the result) of the third one in the Hereafter.
[6065]
Anas reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to me as I was playing with playmates. He greeted and sent me on an errand and I made delay in going to my mother. When I came to her she said: What detained you? I said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent me on an errand. She said: What was the purpose? I said: It is something secret. Therupon she said: Do not then divulge the secret of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) to anyone. Anas said: By Allah, if I were to divulge it to anyone, then, O Thabit, I would have divulged it to you.
[6066]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) told me something secretly. I informed none about that and Umm Sulaim asked me about it, but I did not tell her even.
[6067]
'Amir b. Sa'd reported that he heard his father (Sa'd b. Abi Waqqas) say: never heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say unto one living and moving about that he was in Paradise except to 'Abdullah b. Salim.
[6068]
Qais b. 'Ubada reported:I was in the company of some persons, amongst whom some were the Companions of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) in Medina, that there came a person whose face depicted the fear (of Allah). Some people said: He is a person from amongst the people of Paradise; he is a person from amongst the people of Paradise. He observed two short rak'ahs of prayer and then went out. I followed him and he got into his house and I also got in and we began to converse with each other. And when he became familiar (with me) I said to Him: When you entered (the mosque) before (your entrance in the house) a person said so and so (that you are amongst the people of Paradise), whereupon he said: It is not meet for anyone to say anything which he does not know. I shall (now) tell you why they (say) this. I saw a dream during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and narrated it to him. I seemed to be in a garden [he described its vastness, its rich fructification and its verdure]; in the midst of it, there stood an iron pillar, with its base in the earth and its summit in the sky: and upon its summit there was a handhold. It was said to me: Climb up this (pillar). I said to him (visitant in the dream): I am unable to do it. Thereupon a helper came to me, and he (supported) me (by catching hold of my) garment from behind and thus helped me with his hand and so I climbed up till I was at the summit of the pillar, and grasped the handhold. It was said to me: Ho d it tightly. It was at this that I woke up when (the handhold) was in fthe grip) of my hand. I narrated it (the dream) to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), whereupon he said: That garden implies al-Islam and that pillar implies the pillar of Islam. And that handhold is the firmest faith (as refered to in the Qur'an). And you will remain attached to Islam until you shall die. And that man was 'Abdullah b. Salim.
[6069]
Qais b. 'Ubaida reported: I was (sitting) in a company in which there were (besides others) Sa'd b. Malik and Ibn 'Umar that 'Abdullah b. Saliim happened to pass (by that side). They (the people sitting in that company) said: He is a person from amongst the dwellers of Paradise. I stood up and said to him: They say such and such (thing about you), whereupon he said: Hallowed be Allah, it is not meet for them to say (anything) of which They have no knowledge. Verily I saw as if a pillar had been raised in a green garden and there had been fixed at its (upper) end a handhold and there was a helper at its base. It was said to me: Climb up. So I climbed up and caught hold of the haildhold. I narrated (the contents of this dream) to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), whereupon he said: 'Abdullah would die in a state that he would be catching hold of the firmest handhold (he would die holding fast to the faith).
[6070]
Kharasha b. Hurr reported: I was sitting in a circle in the mosque of Medina and there was an old man, quite handsome. He was 'Abdullah b. Salim. He was telling good things to them (to the people sitting in that company). As he stood up (to depart) the people said: He who is desirous of looking at a person from amongst the people of Paradise should see him. I said: By Allah, I will follow him, and would try to know his residence. So I followed him and he walked on until he reached the outskirts of Medina. He then entered his house. I sought permission from him to get in, and he granted me the permission, saying: My nephew, what is the need (that has brought you here) ? I said to him: As you stood up, I heard people say about you: He who is desirous of seeing a person from among the people of Paradise should look at him. So I became desirous of accompanying you. He ('Abdullah b. Salim) said: It is Allah Who knows best about the people of Paradise. I would, however, narrate to you as to why they said like it. (The story is) that while I was asleep (one night) there came to me a person (in the dream) who asked me to stand up. (So I stood up) and he caught hold of my hand and I walked along with him, and, lo, I found some paths on my left and I was about to set out upon them. Thereupon he said to me Do not set yourself on (them) for these are the paths of the leftists (denizens of Hell-fire).Then there were paths leading to the right side, whereupon he said : Set yourself on these paths. We came across a hill and he said to me: Climb up, and I attempted to climb up that I fell upon my buttocks. I made several attempts (but failed to succeed). He led until he came to a pillar (so high) that its upper end touched the sky and its base was in the earth. And there was a handhold at its upper end. He said to me Climb over it. I said: How can I climb upon it, as its upper end touches the sky? He cought hold of my hand and pushed me up and I found myself suspended with the handhold. He then struck the pillar and it fell down, but I remained attached to that handhold until it was morning (and the dream was thus over). I came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and narrated it to him. He said: So far as the paths which you saw on your left are concerned, these are paths of the leftists (denizens of Hell) and the paths which you saw on your right, these are the paths of the rightists (the dwellers of Paradise) and the mountain represents the destination of the martyrs which you would not be able to attain. The pillar implies the pillar of Islam. and so far as the handhold is concerned, it implies the handhold of Islam, and you would hold to it fastly until you would meet death.
[6071]
Abu Huraira reported that 'Umar happened to pass by Hassan as he was reciting verses in the mosque. He (Hadrat 'Umar) looked towards him (meaningfully), whereupon he (gassin) said: I used to recite (verses) when one better than you (the Holy Prophet) had been present (here). He then looked towards Abu Huraira and said to him: I adjure you by Allah (to tell) if you had not heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: (Hassan), give a reply on my behalf; Allah I help him with Ruh-ul-Qudus. He (Abu Huraira) said: By Allah, it is so (i.e. the Holy Prophet actually said these words).
[6072]
Ibn Musayyib reported that Hassan said to a circle in which there was also Abu Huraira: Abu Huraira, I adjure you by Allah (to tell) whether you-had not heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saying like this.
[6073]
'Abd al-Rahman reported that he heard Hassin b. Thabit al-Ansari call Abu Huraira to bear witness by saying: I adjure you by Allah if you had not heard Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) saying: Hassin, give a reply on behalf of the Messenger of Allah. O Allah, help him with Ruh-ul-Qudus. Abu Huraira said: Yes, it is so.
[6074]
Al-Bari' b. 'Azib reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Hassan b. Thibit, write satire (against the non-believers); Gabriel is with you. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters.
[6075]
Hisham reported on the authority of his father that Hassan b. Thabit talked much about 'A'isha. I scolded him, whereupon she said: My nephew, leave him for he defended Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[6076]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hishim with the same chain of transmitters.
[6077]
Masruq reported: I visited 'A'isha when Hassin was sitting there and reciting verses from his compilation: She is chaste and prudent. There is no calumny against her and she rises up early in the morning without eating the meat of the un- mindful. 'A'isha said: But you are not so. Masruq said: I said to her: Why do you permit him to visit you, whereas Allah has said: "And as for him among them who took upon himself the main part thereof, he shall have a grievous punishment" (XXIV. ll)? Thereupon she said: What tornient can be more severe than this that he has become blind? He used to write satire as a rebuttal on behalf of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[6078]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[6079]
'A'isha reported that Hassin said: Allah's Messenger, permit me to write satire against Abu Sufyan, whereupon he said: How can it be because I am also related to him? Thereupon he (Hassan) said: By Him Who has honoured you. I shall draw you out from them (their family) just as hair is drawn out from the fermented (flour). Thereupon Hassan said: The dignity and greatness belongs to the tribe of Bint Makhzum from amongst the tribe of Hisham, whereas your father was a slave.
[6080]
'Urwa reported on the same chain of transmitters that Hassan b. Thabit sought permission from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) to satirise against the polytheists, but he did not mention Abu Sufyan. And instead of the word al- Khamir, the word al-'Ajin was used.
[6081]
'A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be uport him) said. Satirise against the (non-believing amongst the) Quraish, for (the satire) is more grievous to them than the hurt of an arrow. So he (the Holy Prophet) sent (someone) to Ibn Rawiha and asked him to satirise against them, and he composed a satire, but it did not appeal to him (to the Holy Prophet). He then sent (someone) to Ka'b b. Malik (to do the same, but what he composed did not appeal to the Holy Prophet). He then sent one to Hassan b. Thabit. As he got into his presence, Hassan said: Now you have called for this lion who strikes (the enemies) with his tail. He then brought out his tongue and began to move it and said: By Him Who has sent you with Truth, I shall tear them with my tongue as the leather is torn. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Don't be hasty; (let) Abu Bakr who has the best know- ledge of the lineage of the Quraish draw a distinction for you in regard to my lineage, as my lineage is thesame as theirs. Hassan then came to him (Abu Bakr) and after making inquiry (in regard to the lineage of the Holy Prophet) came back to him (the holy Prophet) and said: Allah's Messenger, he (Abu Bakr) has drawn a distinction in vour lineage (and that of the Quraish) By Him Who has sent you with Truth, I shall draw out from them (your name) as hair is drawn out from the flour. 'A'isha said: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying to Hassin: Verily Ruh-ul- Qudus would continue to help you so long as you put up a defence on behalf of Allah and His Messenger. And she said: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saying: Hassan satirised against them and gave satisfaction to the (Muslims) and disquieted (the non-Muslims).
You satirised Muhammad, but I replied on his behalf,
And there is reward with Allah for this.
You satirised Muhammad. virtuous, righteous,
The Apostle of Allah, whose nature is truthfulness.
So verily my father and his father and my honour
Are a protection to the honour of Muhammad;
May I lose my dear daughter, if you don't see her,
Wiping away the dust from the two sides of Kada',
They pull at the rein, going upward;
On their shoulders are spears thirsting (for the blood of the enemy);
our steeds are sweating-our women wipe them with their mantles.
If you had not interfered with us, we would have performed the 'Umra,
And (then) there was the Victory, and the darkness cleared away.
Otherwise wait for the fighting on the day in which Allah will honour whom He pleases.
And Allah said: I have sent a servant who says the Truth in which there is no ambiguity;
And Allah said: I have prepared an army-they are the Ansar whose object is fighting (the enemy),
There reaches every day from Ma'add abuse, or fighting or satire;
Whoever satirises the Apostle from amongst you, or praises him and helps it is all the same,
And Gabriel, the Apostle of Allah is among us, and the Holy Spirit who has no match.
[6082]
Abu Huraira reported: I invited my mother, who was a polytlieist, to Islam. I invited her one day and she said to me something about Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) which I hated. I came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) weeping and said: Allah's Messenger, I invited my mother to Islam but she did not accept (my invitation). I invited her today but she said to me something which I did not like. (Kindly) supplicate Allah that He may set the mother of Abu Huraira right. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: O Allah, set the mother of Abu Huraira on the right path. I came out quite pleased with the supplication of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and when I came near the door it was closed from within. My mother heard the noise of my footsteps and she said: Abu Huraira, just wait, and I heard the noiee of falling of water. She took a bath and put on the shirt and quickly covered her head with a headdress and opened the door and then said : Abu Huraira, I bear witness to the fact that there is no god but Allah and Mubammad is His bondsman and His Messenger. He (Abu Huraira) said: I went back to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and (this time) I was shedding the tears of joy. I said: Allah's Messenger, be happy, for Allah has responded to your supplication and He has set on the right path the mother of Abu Huraira. He (the Holy Prophet) praised Allah, and extolled Him and uttered good words. I said: Allah's Messenger, supplicate to Allah so that He may instil love of mine and that of my mother too in the believing servants and let our hearts be filled with their love, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said : O Allah, let there be love of these servants of yours, i.e. Abu Huraira and his mother, in the hearts of the believing servants and let their hearts be filled with the love of the believing servants. (Abu Huraira said: This prayer) was so well granted by Allah that no believer was ever born who heard of me and who saw me but did not love me.
[6083]
Al-A'raj reported that he heard Abu Huraira as saying: You are under the impression that Abu Huraira transmits so many ahadith from Allah's Messenger (may peace up upon him) ; (bear in mind) Allah is the great Reckoner. I was a poor man and I served Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) being satisfied with bare subsistence, whereas the immigrants remained busy with transactions in the bazar; while the Ansar had been engaged in looking after their properties. (He further reported) that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said : He who spreads the cloth would not forget anything that he would hear from me. I spread my cloth until he narrated something. I then pressed it against my (chest), so I never forgot anything that I heard from him.
[6084]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Huraira but with the variation that the hadith transmitted on the authority of Malik conclude with the words of Abu Huraira and there is no mention of a transmission of these from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) : "who spreads his cloth," to the end.
[6085]
'A'isha reported : Don't you feel surprised at Abu Huraira? He came (one day) and sat beside the nook of my apartment and began to narrate (the hadith of Allah's Apostle). I was hearing while I was engaged in extolling Allah (reciting Subhan Allah) constantly. He stood up before I finished my repetition of Subhan Allah. if I were to meet him I would have warned him in stern words that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) did not speak so quickly as you talk. Ibn Shihab transmitted on the authority of Ibn Musayyib that Abu Huraira said: People say that Abu Huraira transmits so many ahadith, whereas Allah is the Reckoner, and they say : How is it with Muhajirs and the Ansar that they do not narrate ahadith like him (like Abu Huraira) ? Abu Huraira said: I tell you that my brothers from Ansar remained busy with their lands and my brothers Muhajirs were busy in transactions in the bazars, but I always kept myself attached to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) with bare subsistence. I remained present (in the company of the Holy Prophet), whereas they had been absent. I retained in my mind (what the Holy Prophet said), whereas they forgot it. One day Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: He who amongst you spreads the cloth and listens to my talk and would then press it against his chest would never forget anything heard from me. So I spread my mantle and when he had concluded his talk I then pressed it against my chest and so I never forgot after that day anything that he (the Holy Prophet) said. And if these two verses would not have been revealed in the Book I would have never transmitted anything (to anybody) : "Those who conceal the clear evidence and the guidance that We revealed" (ii. 159) tip to the last verse.
[6086]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Huraira (and the words are) : You say that Abu Huraira narrates so many ahadith from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) ; the rest of the hadith is the same.
[6087]
Ubaidullah b. Rafi', who was the scribe of 'All, reported: I heard 'Ali (Allah be pleased with him) as saying: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent me and Zubair and Miqdad saying: Go to the garden of, Khakh [it is a place between Medina and Mecca at a distance of twelve miles from Medina] and there you will find a woman riding a camel. She would be in possession of a letter, which you must get from her. So we rushed on horses and when we met that woman, we asked her to deliver that letter to us. She said : There is no letter with me. We said: Either bring out that letter or we would take off your clothes. She brought out that letter from (the plaited hair of) her head. We delivered that letter to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in which Hatib b. Abu Balta'a had informed some people amongst the polytheists of Mecca about the affairs of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Hatib, what is this? He said: Allah's messenger, do not be hasty in judging my intention. I was a person attached to the Quraish. Sufyan said : He was their ally but had no relationship with them. (Hatib further said) : Those who are with you amongst the emigrants have blood-relationship with them (the Quraish) and thus they would protect their families. I wished that when I had no blood-relationship with them I should find some supporters from (amongst them) who would help my family. I have not done this because of any unbelief or apostasy and I have no liking for the unbelief after I have (accepted) Islam. Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: You have told the truth. 'Umar said : Allah's Messenger, permit me to strike the neck of this hypocrite. But he (the Holy Prophet) said: He was a participant in Badr and you little know that Allah revealed about the people of Badr : Do what you like for there is forgiveness for you. And Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, said : "O you who believe, do not take My enemy and your enemy for friends" (lx. 1). And there is no mention of this verse in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Abu Bakr and Zubair and Ishaq has in his narration made a mention of the recitation of this verse by Sufyan.
[6088]
'Ali reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent me and Abu Marthad al-Ghitnavi and Zubair b. 'Awwam and we were all riders, and he said: Ride on until you reach the garden of Khakh for there is a woman amongst the polytheists and there is a letter with her sent by Hatib to the polytheists; the rest of the hadith is the same.
[6089]
Jabir reported that a slave of Hatib came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) complaining against Hatib and said: Hatib will definitely go to Hell. (But) Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: You tell a lie; he would not get into that for he had taken part in Badr and in (the expedition of) Hudaibiya.
[6090]
Umm Mubashshir reported that she heard Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying in presence of Hafsa: God willing, the people of the Tree would never enter the fire of Hell one amongst those who owed allegiance under that. She said : Allah's Messenger, why not? He scolded her. Hafsa said: And there is none amongst you but shall have to pass over that (narrow Bridge). Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, has said: We would rescue those persons who are God-conscious and we would leave the tyrants to their fate there (xix. 72).
[6091]
Abu Musa reported: I was in the company of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as he had been sitting in Ji'rana (a place) between Mecca and Medina and Bilal was also there, that there came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) a desert Arab, and he said: Muhammad, fulfill your promise that you made with me. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to him: Accept glad tidings. Thereupon the desert Arab said: You shower glad tidings upon me very much; then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) turned towards Abu Musa and Bilal seemingly in a state of annoyance and said: Verily he has rejected glad tidings but you two should accept them. We said: Allah's Messenger, we have readily accepted them. Then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) called for a cup of water and washed his hands in that and face too and put the saliva in it and then said: Drink out of it and pour it over your faces and over your chest and gladden yourselves. They took hold of the cup and did as Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had commanded them to do. Thereupon Umm Salama called from behind the veil: Spare some water in your vessel for your mother also, and they also gave some water which had been spared for her.
[6092]
Abu Burda reported on the authority of his father that when Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) had been free from the Battle of Hunain, he sent Abu 'Amir as the head of the army of Autas. He had an encounter with Duraid b. as_Simma. Duraid was killed and Allah gave defeat to his friends. Abu Musa said: He (the Holy Prophet) sent me along with Abu 'Amir and Abu 'Amir received a wound in his knee from the arrow,(shot by) a person of Bani Jusham. It stuck in his knee. I went to him and said: Uncle, who shot an arrow upon you? Abu 'Amir pointed out to Abu Musa and said: Verily that one who shot an arrow upon me in fact killed me. Abu Musa said: I followed him with the determination to kill him and overtook him and when he saw me he turned upon his heels. I followed him and I said to him: Don't you feel ashamed (that you run), aren't you an Arab? Why don't you stop ? He stopped and I had an encounter with him and we exchanged the strokes of (swords). I struck him with the sword and killed him. Then I came back to Abu Amir and said: Verily Allah has killed the one who killed you. And he said: Now draw out this arrow. I drew out the arrow and there came out from that (wound) water. Abu 'Amir said: My nephew, go to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and convey my greetings to him and tell him that Abu Amir begs you to ask forgiveness for him. And Abu Amir appointed me as the chief of the people and he died after a short time. When I came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) I visited him and he had been lying on the cot woven by strings and there was (no) bed over it and so there had been marks of the strings on the back of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and on his sides. I narrated to him what had happened to us and narrated to him about Abu Amir and said to him that he had made a request to the effect that forgiveness should be sought for him (from Allah). Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be. upon him) called for water and performed ablution with it. He then lifted his hands and said. O Allah, grant pardon to Thy servant Abu Amir. (The Holy Prophet had raised his hands so high for supplication) that I saw the whiteness of his armpits. He again said: O Allah, grant him distinction amongst the majority of Thine created beings or from amongst the people. I said: Allah's Messenger, ask forgiveness for me too. Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Allah, forgive the sins of Abdullah b. Qais (Abu Musa Ash'ari) and admit him to an elevated place on the Day of Resurrection. Abu Burda said: One prayer is for abu 'Amir and the other is tor Abu Musa.
[6093]
Abu Musa reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: I recognise the voice of the Ash'arites while they recite the Qur'an as they arrive during the night and I also recognise their station from the recital of the Qur'an during the night time, although I have not seen their encampments as they encamp during the day time. And there is a person amongst them, Hakim ; when he encounters the horsemen or the enemies he says to them: My friends command you to wait for them.
[6094]
Abu Musa reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: When the Ash'arites run short of provisions in the campaigns or run short of food for their children in Medina they collect whatever is with them in the cloth and then partake equally from one vessel. They are from me and I am from them.
[6095]
Ibn Abbas reported that the Muslims neither looked to Abu Sufyan (with respect) nor did they sit in his company. he (Abu Sufyan) said to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) : Allah's Apostle, confer upon me three things. He replied in the affirmative. He (further) said: I have with me the most handsome and the best (woman) Umm Habiba, daughter of Abu Sufyan; marry her, whereupon he said: Yes. And he again said: Accept Mu'awiya to serve as your scribe. He said: Yes. He again said: Make me the commander (of the Muslim army) so that I should fight against the unbelievers as I fought against the Muslims. He said: Yes. Abu Zumnail said: If he had not asked for these three things from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), he would have never conferred them upon him, for it was (his habit) to accede to everybody's (earnest) request.
[6096]
Abu Musa reported: We were in Yemen when we heard of the migration of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). We also set out as immigrants to him. And I was accompanied by two brothers of mine, I being the youngest of them ; one of them was Abu Burda and the other one was Abu Ruhm, and there were some other persons with them. Some say they were fifty-three or fifty-two persons of my tribe. We embarked upon a boat, and the boat sailed away to the Negus of Abyssinia. There we met Ja'far b. Abu Talib and his companions. Ja'far said : Allall's Messenger (may peace be upon him) has sent us here and has commanded us to stay here and you should also stay with us. So we stayed with him and we came back (to Medina) and met Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) when Khaibar had been conquered. He (the Holy Prophet) allocated a share to us and in the ordinary course he did not allocate the share to one who had been absent on the occasion of the conquest of Khaibar but conferred (a share) upon him only who had been present there with him. He, however, made an exception for the people of the boat, viz. for Ja'far and his companions. He allocated a share to them, and some persons from amongst the people said to us, viz. the people of the boat: We have preceded you in migration. Asma' bint 'Umais who had migrated to Abyssinia and had come back along with them (along with immigrants) visited Hafsa, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). (Accordingly), Umar had been sitting with her (Hafsa). As 'Umar saw Asma, he said : Who is she ? She (Hafsa) said: She is Asma, daughter of 'Umais. He said: She is an Abyssinian and a sea-woman. Asma said: Yes, it is so. Thereupon 'Umar said: We preceded you in migration and so we have more right to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as compared with you. At this she felt annoyed and said: 'Umar, you are not stating the fact ; by Allah, you had the privilege of being in the company of the Messenger (may peace be upon him) who fed the hungry among you and instructed the ignorant amongst you, whereas we had been far (from here) in the land of Abyssinia amongst the enemies and that was all for Allah and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and, by Allah, I would never take food nor take water unless I make a mention to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) of what you have said. We remained in that country in constant trouble and dread and I shall talk about it to Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) and ask him (about it). By Allah, I shall not tell a lie and deviate (from the truth) and add anything to that. So, when Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) came, she said: Allah's Apostle, 'Umar says so and so. Upon this Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: His right is not more than yours, for him and his companions there is one migration, but for you, i.e. for the people of the boat, there are two migrations. She said: I saw Abu Musa and the people of the boat coming to me in groups and asking me about this hadith, because there was nothing more pleasing and more significant for them than this. Abu Burda reported that Asma said: I saw Abu Musa, asking me to repeat this hadith to him again and again.
[6097]
'A'idh b. Amr reported that Abu Sufyan came to Salman, Suhaib and Bilal in the presence of a group of persons. They said: By Allah, the sword of Allah did not reach the neck of the enemy of Allah as it was required to reach. Thereupon Abu Bakr said: Do you say this to the old man of the Quraish and their chief ? Then he came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon'him) and informed him of this. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Abu Bakr, you have perhaps annoyed them and if you annoyed them you have in fact annoyed your Lord. So Abu Bakr came to them and said: O my brothers, I have annoyed you. They said: No, our brother, may Allah forgive you
[6098]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported that it was concerning them (the Ansar) that this verse was revealed, that when the two groups amongst you were about to lose heart and Allah was the Guardian of them both . This concerned Banu Salama and Banu Haritha and we did not like that Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, should not have revealed this verse for the fact that Allah (gave an assurance) of being the Guardian of both.
[6099]
Zaid b. Arqam reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: O Allah,, grant forgiveness to the Ansar, the offspring of the Ansar and the offspring of the offspring of the Ansar. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shulba with the same chain of transmitters.
[6100]
Anas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sought forgiveness for the Ansar and he said: I think (he also sought forgiveness) for the children of the Ansar and the slaves and the freed men of the Ansar. I have no doubt about it.
[6101]
Anas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saw children and women of the Ansar coming back from a wedding feast. Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) stood up motionless (as a mark of respect) and said: O Allah, (bear witness) (and addressing the Ansar), said: You are dearest to me amongst people, (and said: O Allah (bear witness) (and addressing the Ansar), said: You are dearest to me amongst people. And he meant Ansar.
[6102]
Anas b. Malik reported that a woman from the Ansar came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stood aside with her and said: By Him in Whose Hand is my life, you are dearest to me amongst the people. He repeated it thrice. This hadith has been reported on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters.
[6103]
Anas b. Malik reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Ansar are my family and my trusted friends. and the people would increase in number whereas they (the Ansar) would become less and less, so appreciate the deeds of those from amongst them who do good and overlook their failings.
[6104]
Abu Usaid reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The worthiest clans of the Ansar are Banu Najjar, thereafter Banu al-Ashhal; thereafter Banu Harith b. Banu Khazraj; thereafter Banu Sa'idah and there is goodness in all clans of the Ansar. Sa'd said: I see that he (the Holy Prophet) has placed others above us. It was said to (him): He has placed you above many others.
[6105]
Abu Usaid Ansari has reported this hadith through another chain of transmitters. When the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) was marching towards Badr in order
[6106]
Anas reported a hadith like this from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) but he has made no mention in the hadith of the words of Sa'd.
[6107]
Ibrahim b. Muhammad b. Talha reported: I heard Abu Sa'ld delivering an address in the presence of Abu 'Utba that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: The worthiest settlements of the Ansar are those of Banu Najjar, then of Banu 'Abu al-Ashhal and then of Banu Harith and then of Banu Khazraj and then of the clan of Banu Sa'idah, and if I were to give preference to anyone besides them I would have given preference to my relatives.
[6108]
Abu Usaid Ansar reported: I bear witness to the fact that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The best settlements of the Ansar are of those of Banu Najjar, then of Banu 'Abu al-Aslihal and then of Banu Harith b. Khazraj, then of Banu Sa'ida and there is in every settlement of the Ansar good. Abu Salama reported that Abu Usaid said: Can I tell a Iie about Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) ? And if I were a liar, I would have started with my tribe Banu Sa'ida. This was conveyed to Sa'd b. 'Ubida and he found (rankling) in his mind and said: We have been left behind (in the sense) that we have been (mentioned) last of the four. He (Sa'd) sid: Saddle my pony so that I should go to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). His nephew saw him and said: Are you going to contradict (the order of) precedence set by Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), whereas Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) has the best knowledge of it? Is it not sufficient for you that you are the fourth amongst the four (best tribes of the Ansar) ? So he returned and said: Allah and His Messenger know best, and he commanded that his pony should be unsaddled.
[6109]
Abu Usaid Ansari reported that he heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The worthiest of the Ansar or the worthiest of the settlements and the clans of Ansar; the rest of the hadith is the same, but there is no mention of the story of Sa'd b. 'Ubida (Allah be pleased with him).
[6110]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying in a large gathering of the Muslims: Should I not tell you of the best clans of the Ansar? They said: Allah's Messenger, (kindly) do this. Thereupon Allah's Messenger said: That is Banu Abd al-Ashhal. They said: Allah's Messenger, then next? He said: Banu Najjar. They again said: Allah's Messenger, then next? He said: Then of Banu Harith b. Khazraj. They then said: Allah's Messenger, then next? He said. Then of Banu Sa'ida. They said: Allah's Messenger, then next? He said: There is good in all the clans of the Ansar. It was upon this that Sa'd b. Ubida stood up in annoyance and said: Are we the last of the four as Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) has determined (the order of precedence) of their clans? He decided to talk with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) on this issue, but the people Of his tribe said to him: Be seated, are you not happy with this that Allah's Messenger'(may peace be upon him) has mentioned your clan as one of the four (best) clans and those whom he left and did not mention (the order of their precedence) are more than those whom he mentioned? And Sa'd b. 'Ubada dropped the idea of talking to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) (on this issue).
[6111]
Anas b. Malik reported: I set out along with Jabrir b. 'Abdullah al-Bajali on a journey and he used to serve me. I said to him: Don't do that. Thereupon he said: I have seen Ansar doing this with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). I swore by Allah whenever I accompany any one of the Ansar, I would serve him and Ibn Muthanni, and Ibn Bashshir made this addition in their narrations: Jarir was older than Anas, and Ibn Bashshir said: He was of a more advanced age as compared with Anas. Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) invoked blessings for the tribes of Ghifar and Aslam.
[6112]
Abu Dharr reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Go to your people and say that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) says: Ghifar (is a tribe) to whom Allah granted pardon, and Aslam (is the tribe) to whom Allah granted safety.
[6113]
Abu Dharr reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: To the tribe of Aslam Allah has granted safety and to the tribe of Ghifar Allah has granted pardon.
[6114]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters.
[6115]
This hadith has been narrated through other chains of transmitters but all of them narrated on the authority of Jabir that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: To the tribe of Aslam Allah has granted safety and to the tribe of Ghifar Allah has granted pardon.
[6116]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: To the tribe of Aslam Allah has granted safety and to the tribe of Ghifar Allah has granted pardon. Verily it is not I that say this, but (it is) Allah the Exalted and Glorious. (who) says this.
[6117]
Khufaf b. Jura' reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said in prayer: O Allah, hurl curse upon the tribe of Lihyan and Ri'l aid Dhakwan and Usayya for they disobeyed Allah and His Messenger, (and for) Ghifar Allah has granted pardon and for the tribe of Aslam Allah has granted safety.
[6118]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah has granted pardon to the tribe of Ghifar and to the tribe of Aslam Allah has granted safety and as for Usayya tribe, they disobeyed Allah and His Messenger.
[6119]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Ibn Umar with a slight variation of wording (and the wording) that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said this on the pulpit. This hadith has been reported on the authority of Ibn Umar but through another chain of transmitters.
[6120]
Abu Ayyub reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The tribes of Ansar, Muzaina and Juhaina and Ghifar and Ashja' and those from Banu 'Abdullah, they are my friends amongst the people and Allah and His Messenger are their protectors.
[6121]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Quraish, Ansar, Muzaina, Juhaina and Ghifar, they are my friends and there is no friend of theirs besides Allah and His Messenger.
[6122]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Sa'd b. Ibrahim with a slight variation of wording.
[6123]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The tribes of Ashja', Ghifar and Muzaina and from the tribe of Juhaina they are better than Banu Tamim, Banu Amir and the allies of Asad and Ghatfan.
[6124]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: By Him in Whose Hand is the life of Muhammad, (the tribes of) Ghifar, Aslam, Muzaina, or from the tribe of Juhaina or from the tribe of Muzaina, they would be better in the eye of Allah than Asad, Tayyi, and Ghatfan on the Day of Resurrection.
[6125]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Aslam, Ghifar or some people from Muzaina, Juhaina (with the variation of words) are better in the eye of Allah than Asad, Ghatfan, Hawizin and Tamim. The narrator said: I think he also said: "On the Day of Resurrection."
[6126]
Abu Bakra reported from his father that al-Aqra' b. Habis reported that he came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said to him: How did the tribes of Aslam, Ghifar, Muzaina (and I think he also said Juhaina and the narrator is in doubt about it) owe allegiance to you, whereas they plundered the pilgrims? Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: "you were to say that Aslam, Ghifar, Muzaina and I think Juhaina are better than Banu Tamim, Banu 'Amir and Asad, Ghatfan, then would these people (of latter group of tribes) be in loss? He said: Yes. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: By Him in Whose Hand is my life, these people are better than Banu Tamim, Banu Amir, Asad and Ghatfan, and in this hadith of Abu Shaiba (these words are not found) that Muhammad (the narrator) had a doubt about.
[6127]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Ya'qub Dabbi with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[6128]
Abu Bakra reported from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) that Aslam, Ghifar, Muzaina and Juhaina are better than Banu Tamim, Banu Amir and their allies Banu Asad and Ghatfan.
[6129]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Abu Bishr with the same chain of transmitters.
[6130]
Abu Bakra reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: What is your view if Juhaina, Aslam, Ghifar were better than Banu Tamim, Banu 'Abdullah b. Ghatfan and 'Amir b. Sa'sa'a' respectively (then what would be status of the latter one) ? He said this in a loud voice. They said: Allah's Messenger, they would be definitely at a loss and disadvantage. Thereupon he said: They (the first group) are decidedly better than the others; and in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Abu Kuraib the words are: It you were to find that Juhaina, Muzaina and Aslam and Ghifar (are better than ... ).
[6131]
'Adi b. Hatim reported: I came to Umar b. Khattab and he said to me: The first consignment of Sadaqa brought to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) which brightened the face of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and the faces of his Companions was that of Tayyi.
[6132]
Abu Huraira reported that Tufail and his companions said: Allah's Messenger, the tribe of Daws has disbelieved and has belied you, so invoke curse upon them. It was said: Let Daws be destroyed, whereupon he (Allah's Messenger) said: Allah guide aright the tribe of Daws and direct them to me.
[6133]
Abu Huraira reported: Since I heard three things from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) my love for Banu Tamim is never on the decline (and these things are): I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying about them that they would put up stout resistance against Dajjal amongst my Umma. And he (the narrator) said: (When) the consignment of Zakat was brought to him, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: This is the charity of our people, and there was one slave-girl in the house of 'A'isha and she was from the tribe of Banu Tamim; thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Set her free, for she is from the offspring of Isma'il. The other hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Huraira with a slight variation of wording.
[6134]
Abu Huraira reported: There are some distinguishing features of Banu Tamim which I heard from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and my love for them is never on the decline after that and the words are: They are the bravest amongst people in the battlefield and there is no mention of (the word) "Dajjal".
[6135]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: You would find people like those of mine, the good amongst you in the Days of Ignorance would be good amongst you in the days of Islam, provided they have an understanding of it and you will find good amongst people the persons who would be averse to position of authority until it is thrust upon them, and you will find the worst amongst persons one who has double face. He comes with one face to them and with the other face to the others.
[6136]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Zur'a with a slight variation of wording.
[6137]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Good amongst the women are those who ride camels. One of them said: They are pious women of the Quraish, and the other one said: The women of the Quraish are kind to the orphans in their childhood and look after the wealth of their spouses.
[6138]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Huraira with a slight variation of wording and there is no word "orphan".
[6139]
Abu Huraira reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The women of the Quraish are good amongst the womenfolk. They ride camels and show affection to their children and zealously guard the wealth of their husbands. Abu Huraira said at the end of this narration that Mary, the daughter of Imran, never rode the camel.
[6140]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) gave a proposal of marriage to Umm Hani, the daughter of Abu Talib, whereupon she said: Allah's Messenger, I am of an advanced age with a (large) family. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The best women are those who ride (the camels); the rest of the hadith is the same but with this difference that, instead of the word Ar'a the word Ahna has been used (and the complete sentence is like this): That they treat children in their childhood with affection.
[6141]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The best women who ride the camels are the pious women of the Quraish; they treat with affection children in their childhood and keep a strict watch on the wealth of their spouses.
[6142]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Abu Huraira with the same chain of transmitters.
[6143]
Anas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) established fraternity between Abu Ubaida b. Jarrah and Abu Talha.
[6144]
It was said to Anas b. Malik: You must have heard this that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: There is no alliance (hilf) of brotherhood in Islam. Anas said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) established the bond of fraternity between the Quraish and the Ansar in his home.
[6145]
Anas reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) established fraternity between the Quraish and the Ansar in his house at Medina.
[6146]
Jubair b. Mut'im reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There is no alliance (hilf) in Islam but (the hilf) established in the pre-Islamic days (for good). Islam intensifies and strengthens it.
[6147]
Abu Burda reported on the authority of his father: We offered the sunset prayer along with Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). We then said: If we sit (along with Allah's Messenger) and observe night prayer with him it would be very good, so we sat down and he came to us and said: You are still sitting here. I said: Allah's Messenger, we observed evening prayer with you, then we said: Let us sit down and observe night prayer along with you, whereupon he said: You have done well or you have done right. He then lifted his head towards the sky and it often happened that as he lifted his head towards the sky, he said: The stars are a source of security for the sky and when the stars disappear there comes to the sky, i.e. (it meets the same fate) as it has been promised (it would plunge into darkness). And I am a source of safety and security to my Companions and when I would go away there would fall to the lot (of my Companions) as they have been promised with and my Companions are a source of security for the Umma and as they would go there would fall to the lot of my Umma as (its people) have been promised.
[6148]
Abu Sa'id Khudri reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: A time would come for the people when groups of people would set out for fighting in the cause of Allah and it would be said to them: Is there one amongst you who saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)? And they would say: Yes, and they would be victorious. Then the people would set out for fighting in the cause of Allah and it would be said to them: Is there one amongst you who saw those (who have had the privilege of sitting in the company of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)? And they would say: Yes, and victory would be granted to them. Then a group of persons would set out for fighting in the cause of Allah and it would be said to them: Is there one amongst you who saw one of those who saw those who (had the privilege) of sitting in the company of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)? And they would say: Yes, and the Victory would be granted to them.
[6149]
Abu Sa'id Khudri reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There would come to the people a time when a detachment would be sent for fighting in the cause of Allah and they would say: See, if you can find amongst them someone from amongst the Companions of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). They would find a person and they would be granted victory because of him. Then a second detachment would be sent to them and they would say: Do you find amongst them one who had had the privilege of seeing the Companions of the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him)?-and the victory would be granted to them because of him. Then the third detachment would be sent and it would be said to them: See, if you find amongst them (who had had the honour of seeing one) who saw those who saw the Companions of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). Then the fourth detachment would be sent and it would be said to them: See it you find amongst them one who had the privilege (of seeing) one who saw those who saw those who saw the Companions of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), and a person would be found and they would be granted victory because of him.
[6150]
Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The best of my Umma would be those of the generation nearest to mine. Then those nearest to them, then those nearest to them, then people would come whose witness would precede the oath and the oath will precede the witness. Hannad has not made the mention of Qarn in his narration. Qutaiba said that, instead of the word Qaum, the word Aqwam has been used.
[6151]
Abdullah reported: It was asked from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) who amongst the people were the best. He said: (People) of my generation, then those next to them, then those next to them, then there would come a people whose evidence would precede their oath and their oath would precede their evidence. Ibrahim said: They forbade us to make vows and bear witness when we were too young.
[6152]
This hadith has been transmitted by Mansur on the authority of Abu al-Ahwas and Jarir with a slight variation of wording.
[6153]
'Abdullah (b. Mas'ud) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: The best among people are of my generation, then those next to them. (The narrator said): I do not know whether (he said) it three times or four times. Then there would fellow after them such persons whose evidence would precede the oath, and in case of some others, the oath (would precede) the evidence.
[6154]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may, peace be upon him) as saying: The best age of my Umma is one in which I was sent (by Allah as an Apostle), then the one next to that. (The narrator said): And Allah knows best whether he stated this third (time) or not. Then there would come people who would love (to look) bulky and they would hasten to the witness box before they are asked to bear witness.
[6155]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Abu Huraira through another chain of transmitters (but with this variation) that Abu Huraira said: I do not know whether he (the Holy Prophet) said (these words: "Then next") twice or thrice.
[6156]
Imran b. Husain reported Allah's-Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The best among you (are) the people (who belong to) my age. Then those next to them, then those next to them, then those next to them. 'Imran said: I do not know whether Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said twice or thrice (the words: "Then next") after (saying) about his (own age but he then said): Then after them (after successors or those who would succeed them) would come a people who would give evidence before they are asked for it, and would be dishonest and not trustworthy, who would make vows but would not fulfil them, and would be significant in being bulky.
[6157]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters (and the words are): I do not know whether he made a mention of two generations after his generation or of the third one too. Shababa said: I heard this from Zahdam b. Mudarrib as he came to me riding a horse for some need and he narrated it to me that he had heard it from 'Imran b. Husain, and in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Yahya and Shababa (the words are): They take an oath but they do not fulfil it, and in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Bahz there the word is Yafun as transmitted on the authority of Ibn Ja'far.
[6158]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Imran b. Husain through another chain of transmitters (and the words are): The best generation of this Umma is the generation to which I have been sent, then the next one, and there is an addition in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Abu 'Awana (and the words are): And Allah knows best whether he made a mention of the third (generation) or not; the rest of the hadith is the same as transmitted by Zahdam on the authority of 'Imran. And in the hadith transmitted by Hisham on the authority of Qatada there is an addition of these words: They take an oath whereas they are not asked to take.
[6159]
'A'isha reported that a person asked Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as to who amongst the people were the best. He said: Of the generation to which I belong, then of the second generation (generation adjacent to my generation), then of the third generation (generation adjacent to the second generation).
[6160]
'Abdullah b. Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) led us 'Isha' prayer at the latter part of the night and when he had concluded it by salutations he stood up and said : Have you seen this night of yours? At the end of one hundred years after this none would survive on the surface of the earth (from amount my Companions). Ibn Umar said: People were (not understanding) these words of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) which had been uttered pertaining to one hundred years. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in fact meant (by these words) that on that day none from amongst those who had been living upon the earth (from amongst his Companions) would survive (after one hundred years) and that would be the end of this generation.
[6161]
This hadith has been transmitted by Zuhri on the authority of Ma'mar.
[6162]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying this one month before his death: You asked me about the Last Hour whereas its knowledge is with Allah. I, however, take an oath and say that none upon the earth, the created beings (from amongst my Companions), would survive at the end of one hundred years. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Juraij with the same chain of transmitters, but there is no mention of the words: "one month before his death".
[6163]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying one mouth before his death (or something like it): None amongst the created beings who had been living by that time (during the lifetime of Allah's Apostle) ....'Abd al-Rahman has interpreted these words of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as: The ages (of the people) would be diminished.
[6164]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Sulaiman Taimi through other chains of transmitters.
[6165]
Abu Sa'id reported that when Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) came back from Tabuk they (his Companions) asked about the Last Hour. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: There would be none amongst the created beings living on the earth (who would survive this century).
[6166]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: None amongst the created beings (from my Companions) would survive after one hundred years. Salim said: We made a mention of it to him (Jabir), whereupon he said: It means those who had been living on that day.
[6167]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do not revile my Companions, do not revile my Companions. By Him in Whose Hand is my life, if one amongst you would have spent as much gold as Uhud it would not amount to as much as one much on behalf of one of them or half of it.
[6168]
Abu Sa'id reported there was some altercation between Khalid b. Walid and Abd al-Rahman b. 'Auf and Khalid reviled him. Thereupon Allah's Messwger (may peace be upon him) said: None should revile my Companions. for if one amongst you were to spend as much gold as Uhud, it would not amount to as much as one mudd of one of them or half of it.
[6169]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of al-A'mash and there is no mention by Shu'ba and Waki' of 'Abd al-Rahman b. Auf and Khalid.
[6170]
Usair b. Jabir reported that a delegation from Kufa came to 'Umar and there was a person amongst them who jeered at Uwais. Thereupon Umar said: Is there amongst us one from Qaran? That person came and Umar said: Verily Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) has said: There would come to you a person from Yemen who would be called Uwais and he would leave none in Yemen (behind him) except his mother, and he would have the whiteness (due to leprosy) and he supplicated Allah and it was cured except for the size of a dinar or dirham. He who amongst you meets him should ask him to supplicate for forgiveness (from Allah) for you.
[6171]
'Umar b. Khattab reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Worthy amongst the successors would be a person who would be called Uwais. He would have his mother (living with him) and he would have (a small) sign of leprosy. Ask him to beg pardon for you (from Allah).
[6172]
Usair b. Jabir reported that when people from Yemen came to help (the Muslim army at the time of jihad) he asked them: Is there amongst you Uwais b. 'Amir? (He continued finding him out) until he met Uwais. He said: Are you Uwais b. ,Amir? He said: Yes. He said: Are you from the tribe of Qaran? He said: Yes. He (Hadrat) 'Umar (again) said: Did you suffer from leprosy and then you were cured from it but for the space of a dirham ? He said: Yes. He ('Umar) said: Is your mother (living) ? He said: Yes. He ('Umar) said: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say: There would come to you Uwais b. Amir with the reinforcement from the people of Yemen. (He would be) from Qaran, (the branch) of Murid. He had been suffering from leprosy from which he was cured but for a spot of a dirham. His treatment with his mother would have been excellent. If he were to take an oath in the name of Allah, He would honour that. And if it is possible for you, then do ask him to beg forgiveness for you (from your Lord). So he (Uwais) begged forgiveness for him. Umar said : Where do you intend to go ? He said : To Kufa. He ('Umar) said : Let me write a letter for you to its governor, whereupon he (Uwais) said : I love to live amongst the poor people. When it was the next year, a person from among the elite (of Kufa) performed Hajj and he met Umar. He asked him about Uwais. He said: I left him in a state with meagre means of sustenance. (Thereupon) Umar said: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There would come to you Uwais b. 'Amir, of Qaran, a branch (of the tribe) of Murid, along with the reinforcement of the people of Yemen. He had been suffering from leprosy which would have been cured but for the space of a dirham. His treatment with his mother would have been very kind. If he would take an oath in the name of Allah (for something) He would honour it. Ask him to beg forgiveness for you (from Allah) in case it is possible for you. So he came to Uwais and said.: Beg forgiveness (from Allah) for me. He (Uwais) said: You have just come from a sacred journey (Hajj) ; you, therefore, ask forgiveness for me. He (the person who had performed Hajj) said: Ask forgiveness for me (from Allah). He (Uwais again) said: You have just come from the sacred journey, so you ask forgiveness for me. (Uwais further) said: Did you meet Umar? He said: Yes. He (Uwais) then begged forgiveness for him (from Allah). So the people came to know about (the status of religious piety) of Uwais. He went away (from that place). Usair said: His clothing consisted of a mantle, and whosoever saw him said: From where did Uwais get this mantle?
[6173]
Abu Dharr reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: You would soon conquer a land where people are in the habit of using foul language. They have a right of kinship upon you. And when you see two persons fighting for the space of a brick, then get out of that. He (Abu Dharr) then happened to pass by Rabila and 'Abd al-Rahman, the two sons of Shurahbil b. Hasana, and they had been disputing for the space of a brick. So he left the land.
[6174]
Abu Dharr reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: You would soon conquer Egypt and that is a land which is known (as the land of al-qirat). So when you conquer it, treat its inhabitants well. For there lies upon you the responsibility because of blood-tie or relationship of marriage (with them). And when you see two persons falling into dispute amongst themselves for the space of a brick, than get out of that. He (Abu Dharr) said: I saw Abd al-Rahman b. Shurahbil b. Hasana and his brother Rabi'a disputing with one another for the space of a brick. So I left that (land).
[6175]
Abu Barza reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent a person to a tribe amongst the tribes of Arabia. They reviled him and beat him. He came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and narrated to him (the story of atrocities perpetrated upon him by the people of the tribe). Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: If you were to come to the people of 'Uman, they would have neither reviled you nor beaten you.
[6176]
Abu Naufal reported: I saw (the dead body) of Abdullah b. Zubair hanging on the road of Medina (leading to Mecca). The Quraish passed by it and other people too, that Abdullah b. Umar happened to pass by it. He stood up there and said: May there be peace upon you, Abu Khubaib (the Kunya of Hadrat 'Abdullah b. Zubair), may there be peace upon you Abu Khubaib, may there be peace upon you, Abu Khubaib ! By Allah, I used to forbid you from this; by Allah, I used to forbid you from this, by Allah I used to forbid you from this. By Allah, so far as I know, you had been very much devoted to fasting and prayer and you had been paying very much care to cementing the ties of blood. By Allah, the group to which you belong (are labelled) as (a) wicked (person) is indeed a fine group. Then 'Abdullah b. 'Umar went away. The stand 'Abdullah (b. 'Umar) took in regard to the inhuman treatment (meted out to 'Abdullah b. Zubair) and his words (in that connection) were conveyed to Hajjaj (b. Yusuf) and (as a consequence of that) he (the body of Abdullah b. Zubair) was brought down from the stump (the scaffold) by which it was hanging and thrown into the graves of the Jews. He (Hajjaj) sent (his messenger) to Asma' (bint Abu Bakr, 'Abdullah's mother). But she refused to come. He again sent the messenger to her with the message that she must come, otherwise he would bring her forcibly catching hold of her hair. But she again refused and said: By Allah, I will not come to you until you send one to me who would drag me by pulling my hair. Thereupon he said: Bring me my shoes. He put on his shoes and walked on quickly swollen with vanity and pride until he came to her and said: How do you find what I have done with the enemy of Allah? She said: I find that you wronged him in this world, whereas he has spoiled your next life. It has been conveyed to me that you used to call him ('Abdullah b. Zubair) as the son of one having two belts. By Allah, I am indeed (a woman) of two belts. One is that with the help of which I used to suspend high the food of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and that of Abu Bakr (making it out of the reach) of animals and, so far as the second belt is concerned, that is the belt which no woman can dispense with. Verily Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) told us that in Thaqif, there would be born a great liar and great murderer. The liar we have seen, and as far as the murderer is concerned, I do not find anyone else besides you. 'Thereupon he (Hajjaj) stood up and did not give any reply to her.
[6177]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If the din were at the Pleiades, even then a person from Persia would have taken hold of it, or one amongst the Persian descent would have surely found it.
[6178]
Abu Huraira reported: We were sitting in the company of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) that Sura al-Jumu'a was revealed to him and when he recited (these words) : "Others from amongst them who have not yet joined them," a person amongst them (those who were sitting there) said: Allah's Messenger! But Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) made no reply, until he questioned him once, twice or thrice. And there was amongst us Salman the Persian. The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) placed his hand on Salman and then said: Even if faith were near the Pleiades, a man from amongst these would surely find it.
[6179]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: You would find people like one hundred camels and you would not find even one (camel) fit for riding.
[6180]
Abu Huraira reported that a person came to Allah,'s Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said : Who among the people is most deserving of a fine treatment from my hand ? He said : Your mother. He again said : Then who (is the next one) ? He said: Again it is your mother (who deserves the best treatment from you). He said: Then who (is the next one) ? He (the Holy Prophet) said : Again, it is your mother. He (again) said: Then who? Thereupon he said: Then it is your father. In the hadith transmitted on the authority of Qutalba, there is no mention of the word "the people".
[6181]
Abu Huraira reported that a person said: Allah's Messenger, who amongst the people is most deserving of my good treatment? He said: Your mother, again your mother, again your mother, then your father, then your nearest relatives according to the order (of nearness).
[6182]
Abu Huraira reported: A person came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). The rest of the hadith is the same as transmitted by jarir but with this addition: By your father, you would get the information.
[6183]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Shubruma with the same chain of transmitters and the hadith transmitted on the authority of Wuhaib there is a slight variation of wording. Same is the case with the hadith transmitted on the authority of Muhammad b. Talha (and the words are): "Who amongst the people deserves the best treatment from me".
[6184]
Abdullah b. 'Anir reported that a person came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and sought permission (to participate) in Jihad, whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Are your parents living? He said: Yes. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: You should put in your best efforts (in their) service.
[6185]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Habib with the same chain of transmitters.
[6186]
Yazid b. Abu Habib reported that Na'im, the freed slave of Umm Salama, reported to him that 'Abdullah b. 'Amr b. 'As said: There came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) a person and said: I owe allegiance to you for migration and Jihad seeking reward only from Allah. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Is one from amongst your parents living ? He said : Yes, of course, both are living. He further asked: Do you want to seek reward from Allah? He said: Yes. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said : Go back to your parents and accord them benevolent treatment.
[6187]
Abu Huraira reported that Juraij was one who was devoted to (prayer) in the temple. His mother came to him. Humaid said that Abu Rafi' demonstrated before us like the demonstration made by abu Huraira to whom Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had demonstrated as his mother called him placing her palms upon the eyebrows and lifting her head for calling him and said: Juraij, it is your mother, so talk to her. She found him at that time absorbed in prayer, so he said (to himself): O Lord, my mother (is calling me) (whereas I am absorbed) in my prayer. He opted for prayer. She (his mother) went back, then came again for the second time and said: O Juraij, it is your mother (calling you), so talk to me. He said: O Allah. there is my mother also and my prayer, and he opted for prayer. She said: O Allah, this Juraij is my son. I pray to talk to him but he refuses to talk to me. O Allah, don't bring death to him unless he has seen the prostitutes, and had she invoked the curse upon him (from the heart of her heart) he would have been involved in some turmoil. There was a shepherd living near by his temple (the temple where Juraij was engaged in prayer). It so happened that a woman of that village came there and that shepherd committed fornication with her and she became pregnant and gave birth to a child. It was said to her: Whose child is this? She said: He is the child of one who is living in this temple. So there came persons with hatchets and spades. They called Juraij. He was absorbed in prayer and he did not talk to them and they were about to demolish that temple that he saw them and then came to them and they said: Ask her (this woman) what she says. He smiled and then touched the head of the child and said: Who is your father? He (the child) said: My father is the shepherd of the sheep, and when they heard this, they said: We are prepared to rebuild with gold and silver what we have demolished from your temple. He said: No, rebuild it with clay as it had been before. He then went up (to his room and absorbed himself in prayer).
[6188]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: None spoke in the cradle but only three (persons), Christ son of Mary, the second one the companion of Juraij. Juraij had got constructed a temple and confined himself in that. His mother came to him as he was busy in prayer and she said: Juraij. He said: My Lord, my mother (is calling me while I am engaged in) my prayer. He continued with the prayer. She returned and she came on the next day and he was busy in prayer, and she said: Juraij. And he said: My Lord, my mother (is calling me while I am engaged) in prayer, and he continued with the prayer and she went back, and then on the next day she again came and he was busy in prayer and she said: Juraij. And he said: My Lord, my mother (is calling me while I am engaged in my prayer, and he continued with the prayer, and she said: My Lord, don't give him death unless he has seen the fate of the prostitutes. The story of Juraij and that of his meditation and prayer gained currency amongst Bani Isra'il. There was a prostitute who had been a beauty incarnate. She said (to the people): If you like I can allure him to evil. She presented herself to him but he paid no heed (to her). She came to a shepherd who lived near the temple and she offered herself to him and he had a sexual intercourse with her and so she became pregnant arid when she gave birth to a child she said: This is from Juraij. So they came and asked him to get down and demolished the temple and began to beat him. He said: What is the matter? They said: You have committed fornication with this prostitute and she has given birth to a child from your loins. He said: Where is the child ? They brought him (the child) and he said: just leave me so that I should observe prayer. And he observed prayer and when he finished, he came to the child. He struck his stomach and said: O boy, who is your father? lie said: He is such shepherd. So they turned towards Juraij, kissed him and touched him (for seeking blessing) and said: We are prepared to construct your temple with gold. He said. No, just rebuild it with mud as it had been, and they did that. Then there was a babe who was sucking his mother that a person dressed in fine garment came riding upon a beast. His mother said: O Allah, make my child like this one. He (the babe) left sucking and began to see towards him, and said: O Allah, don't make me like him. He then returned to the chest and began to suck the milk of his mother. He (Abu Huraira) said: I perceived as if I am seeing Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as he is explaining the scene of his sucking milk with his forefinger in his mouth and sucking that. He (Abu Huraira) further reported Allah's Apostle (may be peace upon him) as saying: There happened to pass by him a girl who was being beaten and they were saying: You have committed adultery and you have committed theft and she was saying: Allah is enough for me and He is my good Protector, and his mother said: O Allah, don't make my child like her and he left sucking the milk, and looked towards her and said: O Allah, make me like her, and there was a talk between them. She said: O with shaven head, a good-looking person happened to pass by and I said: O Allah, make my child like him, and you said: O Allah, don't make me like him, and they passed by a girl while they were beating her and saying: You committed fornication and you committed theft, and I said: O Allah, don't make my child like her, and you said: O Allah, make me like her. Thereupon he said: That person was a tyrant, and I said: O Allah, don't make me like him, and they were saying about her: You committed fornication whereas in fact she had not committed that and they were saying: You have committed theft whereas she had not committed theft, so I said: O Allah, make me like her.
[6189]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Let him be humbled into dust; let him be humbled into dust. It was said: Allah's Messenger, who is he? He said: He who sees either of his parents during their old age or he sees both of them, but he does not enter Paradise.
[6190]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Let him be humbled, let him be humbled. It was said: Allah's Messenger, who is he? He said. He who finds his parents in old age, either one or both of them, and does not enter Paradise.
[6191]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Let him be humbled thrice, and the rest of the hadith is the same.
[6192]
Ibn Dinar reported that a desert Arab met Abdullah b. 'Umar on the way to Mecca. 'Abdullah greeted him and mounted him upon the donkey on which he had been riding and gave him the turban that he had on his head. Ibn Dinar (further) reported: We said to him ('Abdullah b. 'Umar): May Allah do good to you, these are desert Arabs and they are satisfied even with meagre (things). Thereupon Abdullah said: His father was loved dearly by 'Umar b. Khattib and I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The finest act of goodness on the part of a son is to treat kindly the loved ones of his father.
[6193]
'Abdullah b. Umar reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: The finest act of goodness is that a person should treat kindly the loved ones of his father.
[6194]
Abdullah b. Dinar reported that when 'Abdullah b. 'Umar set out to Mecea,'he kept a donkey with him which he used as a diversion from the tedium of journey on the camel's back and had a turban which he tied round his head. One day, as he was riding the donkey a desert Arab happened to pass by him. He ('Abdullah b. 'Umar) said: Arn't you so and so? He said: Yes He gave him his donkey and said: Ride it, and tie the turban round your head. Some of his companions said: May Allah pardon you, you gave to this desert Arab the donkey on which you enjoyed ride for diversion and the turban which you tied round your.head. Thereupon he said: Verily I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The finest act of goodness is the kind treatment of a person to the loved ones of his father after his death and the father of this person was a friend of 'Umar.
[6195]
Nawwas b. Sim'an al-Ansiri reported: I asked Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) about virtue and vice. He said: Virtue is a kind disposition and vice is what rankles in your heart and that you disapprove that people should come to know of it.
[6196]
Nawwis b. Sim'in reported: I stayed with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) for one year. What obstructed me to migrate was (nothing) but (persistent) inquiries from him (about Islam). (It was a common observation) that when anyone of us migrated (to Medina) he ceased to ask (too many questions) from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). So I asked him about virtue and vice. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Virtue is a kind disposition and vice is what rankles in your mind and that you disapprove of its being known to the people.
[6197]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Verily Allah created the universe and when He had finished that, ties of relationship came forward and said This is the place for him who seeks refuge from severing (of blood-relationship). He said: Yes. Are you not satisfied that I should keep relationship with one who joins your ties of relationship and sever it with one who severs your (ties of relationship)? They (the ties of blood) said: Certainly so. Thereupon He said: Well, that is how things are for you. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) then said: Recite if you like: "But if you turn away you are sure to make mischief in the land and cut off the ties of kinship. Those it is whom Allah has cursed, so He has made them deaf and blinded their eyes. Do they not reflect on the Qur'an? Or, are there locks on their hearts?" .
[6198]
'A'isha reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The tie of kinship is suspended to the Throne and says: He who unites me Allah would unite him and he who severed me Allah would sever him.
[6199]
Jubair b. Mut'im reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The severer would not enter Paradise. Ibn Umar said that Sufyan (explained it as): One who severs the tie of kinship would not enter Paradise.
[6200]
Jubair b. Mutlim reported that his father narrated to him that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The severer of the tie of kinship would not get into Paradise.
[6201]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters.
[6202]
Anas b. Malik reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who is desirous that his means of sustenance should be expanded for him or his age may be lengthened, should join the tie of relationship.
[6203]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: He who likes that his sustenance should be expanded and his age may be lengthened should join the tie of kinship.
[6204]
Abu Huraira reported that a person said: Allah's Messenger, I have relatives with whom I try, to have close relationship, but they sever (this relation). I treat them well, but they treat me ill. I am sweet to them but they are harsh towards me. Upon this he (the Holy Prophet) said: If it is so as you say, then you in fact throw hot ashes (upon their faces) and there would always remain with you on behalf of Allah (an Angel to support you) who would keep you dominant over them so long as you adhere to this (path of righteousness).
[6205]
Anas b. Malik reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Neither nurse mutual hatred, nor jealousy, nor enmity, and become as fellow. brothers and servants of Allah. It is not lawful fora Muslim that he should keep his relations estranged with his brother beyond three days.
[6206]
Anas b. Malik reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying like this. This hadith has been narrated through another chain of transmitters.
[6207]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters with the addition of Ibn Uyaina (and the words are) : "Do not cut off (mutual relations)."
[6208]
This hadith has been narrated through another chain of transmitters and the hadith transmitted on the authority of Abd al-Razziq (the words are): "Neither nurse grudge nor sever (the ties of kinship), nor nurse enmity."
[6209]
Anas reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Nurse no grudge, nurse no aversion and do not sever ties of kinship and live like fellow-brothers as servants of Allah. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters but with this addition: "As Allah has commanded you."
[6210]
Abu Ayyub Ansiri reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: It is not permissible for a Muslim to have estranged relations with his brother beyond three nights, the one turning one way and the other turning the other way when they meet ; the better of the two is one who is the first to give a greeting.
[6211]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Zuhri with a slight variation of wording (and the words are) : "The one turning away and the other turning away when they meet and one avoids the other and the other also avoids him."
[6212]
'Abdullah b. 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: It is not permissible for a Muslim to have estranged relations with his brother beyond three days.
[6213]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There should be no estranged relations beyond three days.
[6214]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Avoid suspicion, for suspicion is the gravest lie in talk and do not be inquisitive about one another and do not spy upon one another and do not feel envy with the other, and nurse no malice, and nurse no aversion and hostility against one another. And be fellow-brothers and servants of Allah.
[6215]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Don't have estranged relations (with the others) and don't nurse enmity and don't enter into a transaction when the other (has already entered) and be fellow-brothers and servants of Allah.
[6216]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying. Don't nurse malice against one another, don't nurse aversion against one another and don't be inquisitive about one another and don't outbid one another (with a view to raising the price) and be fellow-brothers and servants of Allah.
[6217]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmit ters (and the words are) : "Don't sever relations of kinship, don't bear enmity against one another, don't bear aversion against one another and don't feel envy against the other and live as fellow-brothers as Allah has commanded you.
[6218]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Don't bear aversion against one another and don't be jealous of one another and be servants of Allah.
[6219]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Don't nurse grudge and don't bid him out for raising the price and don't nurse aversion or enmity and don't enter into a transaction when the others have entered into that transaction and be as fellow-brothers and servants of Allah. A Muslim is the brother of a Muslim. He neither oppresses him nor humiliates him nor looks down upon him. The piety is here, (and while saying so) he pointed towards his chest thrice. It is a serious evil for a Muslim that he should look down upon his brother Muslim. All things of a Muslim are inviolable for his brother in faith: his blood, his wealth and his honour.
[6220]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Huraira with some addition (and it is this): "Verily Allah does not look to your bodies nor to your faces but He looks to your hearts," and he pointed towards the heart with his fingers.
[6221]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upqn him) as saying: Verily Allah does not look to your faces and your wealth but He looks to your heart and to your deeds.
[6222]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The gates of Paradise are not opened but on two days, Monday and Thursday. and then every servant (of Allah) is granted pardon who does not associate anything with Allah except the person in whose (heart) there is rancour against his brother. And it would be said : Look towards both of them until there is reconciliation ; look toward both of them until there is reconciliation; look towards both of them until there is reconciliation. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Suhail who narrated it on the authority of his father with the chain of transmitters of MaIik, but with this variation of wording: ,(Those would not be granted pardon) who bycott each other."
[6223]
Abu Huraira reported it as a marfu' hadith (and the words are) : The deeds are presented on every Thursday and Friday and Allah, the Exalted and Glorious. grants pardon to every person who does not associate anything with Allah except the person in whose (heart) there is rancour against his brother. It would be said: Put both of them off until they are reconciled.
[6224]
Abu Huraim reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying The deeds of people would be presented every week on two days, viz. Monday and Thursday, and every believing servant would be granted pardon except the one in whose (heart) there is rancour against his brother and it would he said: Leave them and put them off until they are turned to reconciliation.
[6225]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Verily. Allah would say on the Day of Resurrection: Where are those who have mutual love for My Glory's sake? Today I shall shelter them in My shadow when there is no other shadow but the shadow of Mine.
[6226]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: A person visited his brother in another town and Allah deputed an Angel to wait for him on his way and when he came to him he said: Where do you intend to go? He said: I intend to go to my brother in this town. He said: Have you done any favour to him (the repayment of which you intend to get) ? He said: No,excepting this that I love Mm for the sake of Allah, the Exalted and Glorious. Thereupon he said: I am a meesenger to you from, Allah:(to inform you) that Allah loves you as you love him (for His sake) This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hammid b. Salama with the same of transmitters.
[6227]
Abu Rabi' reported directly from Allah's Apostle (may peace upon him) as saying: The one who visits the sick is in fact like one who is in the fruit garden of Paradise so long as he does not return.
[6228]
Thauban, the freed slave of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: He who visits the sick continues to remain in the fruit garden of Paradise until he returns.
[6229]
Thauban reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Verily, when a Muslim visits his brother in Islam he is supposed to remain in the fruit garden of Paradise until he returns.
[6230]
Thauban, the freed slave of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who visits the sick is supposed to remain in the fruit garden of Paradise.It was said : Allah's Messenger, what is this Khurfat-ul-jannah? He said: It is a place abounding in fruits.
[6231]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Asim al-Ahwal with the same chain of transmitters.
[6232]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying : Verily, Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, would say on the Day of Resurrection: O son of Adam, I was sick but you did not visit Me. He would say: O my Lord; how could I visit Thee whereas Thou art the Lord of the worlds? Thereupon He would say: Didn't you know that such and such servant of Mine was sick but you did not visit him and were you not aware of this that if you had visited him, you would have found Me by him? O son of Adam, I asked food from you but you did not feed Me. He would say: My Lord, how could I feed Thee whereas Thou art the Lord of the worlds? He said: Didn't you know that such and such servant of Mine asked food from you but you did not feed him, and were you not aware that if you had fed him you would have found him by My side? (The Lord would again say:) O son of Adam, I asked drink from you but you did not provide Me. He would say: My Lord, how could I provide Thee whereas Thou art the Lord of the worlds? Thereupon He would say: Such and such of servant of Mine asked you for a drink but you did not provide him, and had you provided him drink you would have found him near Me.
[6233]
'A'isha reported, I did not see anyone else being afflicted with more severe illness than Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). In the narration transmitted by 'Uthman there is a slight variation of wording.
[6234]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of A'mash through other chains of transmitters.
[6235]
'Abdullah reported: I visited Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as he was running high temperature. I touched his body with my bard and said to him: Allah's Messenger, you are running high temperature, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said : Yes, it is so. I comparatively have a more severe fever than any one of you. I said : Is it because there is a double reward in store for you ? Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said : Yes, it is so. And Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) again said: When a Muslim falls ill, his compensation is that his minor sins are obliterated just as leaves tall (in autumn). In the hadith transmitted on the authority of Zubair there is (no mention of these words) : "I touched his body with my hands."
[6236]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of jarir and the hadith transmitted on the authority of Abu Mu'awiya there is an addition of these words: He said: Yes, by Him in Whose Hand is my life, there is no Muslim upon the earth." The rest of the hadith is the same.
[6237]
Aswad reported that some young men from the Quraish visited 'A'isha as she was in Mina and they were laughing. She said: What makes you laugh? They said: Such and such person stumbled against the rope of the tent and he was about to break his neck or lose his eyes. She said: Don't laugh for I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If a Muslim runs a thorn or (gets into trouble) severe than this, there is assured for him (a higher) rank and his sins are obliterated.
[6238]
'A'isha reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A believer does not receive (the trouble) of running a thorn or more than that but Allah elevates him in rank or effaces his sins because of tbat.
[6239]
'A'isha reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A believer does not undergo (the trouble) of running a thorn or more than that when Allah effaces his sins.
[6240]
'A'isha said: No trouble comes to a believer even if it is the pricking of a thorn that it becomes (the means) whereby his sins are effaced or his sins are obliterated. Yazid says: He does not know which word 'Urwa said (whether he said Qussa or Kuffira).
[6241]
'A'isha reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There is nothing (in the form of trouble) that comes to a believer even if it is the pricking of a thorn that there is decreed for him by Allah good or his sins are obliterated.
[6242]
Abu Sa'id and abu Huraira reported that they heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Never a believer is stricken with discomfort, hardship or illness, grief or even with mental worry that his sins are not expiated for him.
[6243]
Abu Huraira reported that when this verse was revealed: "Whoever does evil will be requited for it" , and when this was conveyed to the Muslims they were greatly perturbed. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Be moderate and stand firm in trouble that falls to the lot of a Muslim (as that) is an expiation for him ; even stumbling on the path or the prickin of a thorn (are an expiation for him). Muslim said that 'Umar b. Abd al-Rahman Muhaisin was from amongst the people of Mecca.
[6244]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) visited Umm Sa'ib or Umm Musayyib and said: Umm Sa'ib or Umm Musayyib. why is it that you are shivering? She said: "It is fever and may it not be blessed by Allah, whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Don't curse fever for it expiates the sir of the posterity of Adam just as furnace removes the alloy of iron.
[6245]
'Ata' b. Abi Rabih said: Ibn Abbas said to me: May I show you a woman of Paradise? I said: Yes. He said: Here is this dark-complexioned woman. She came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and said: I am suffering from falling sickness and I become naked; supplicate Allah for me, whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Show endurance as you can do and there would be Paradise for you and, if you desire, I supplicate Allah that He may cure you. She said: I am prepared to show endurance (but the unbearable trouble is) that I become naked, so supplicate Allah that He should not let me become naked, so he supplicated for her.
[6246]
Abu Dharr reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying that Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, said: My servants, I have made oppression unlawful for Me and unlawful for you, so do not commit oppression against one another. My servants, all of you are liable to err except one whom I guide on the right path, so seek right guidance from Me so that I should direct you to the right path. O My servants, all of you are hungry (needy) except one whom I feed, so beg food from Me, so that I may give that to you. O My servants, all of you are naked (need clothes) except one whom I provide garments, so beg clothes from Me, so that I should clothe you. O My servants, you commit error night and day and I am there to pardon your sins, so beg pardon from Me so that I should grant you pardon. O My servants, you can neither do Me any harm nor can you do Me any good. O My servants, even if the first amongst you and the last amongst you and even the whole of human race of yours, and that of jinns even, become (equal in) God-conscious like the heart of a single person amongst you, nothing would add to My Power. O My servants, even if the first amongst you and the last amongst you and the whole human race of yours and that of the Jinns too in unison become the most wicked (all beating) like the heart of a single person, it would cause no loss to My Power. O My servants, even if the first amongst you and the last amongst you and the whole human race of yours and that of jinns also all stand in one plain ground and you ask Me and I confer upon every person what he asks for, it would not. in any way, cause any loss to Me (even less) than that which is caused to the ocean by dipping the needle in it. My servants, these for you I shall reward you for thern, so he who deeds of yours which I am recording finds good should praise Allah and he who does not find that should not blame anyone but his ownself. Sa'id said that when Abu Idris Khaulini narrated this hadith he knelt upon his knees.
[6247]
Abu Dharr reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying that he reported it from his Lord, the Exalted and Glorious: Verily I have made oppression unlawful for Me and for My servants too, so do not commit oppression. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[6248]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Be on your guardagainst committing oppression, for oppression is a darkness on the Day of Resurrection, and be on your guard against pettimindedness for pettimindedness destroyed those who were before you, as it incited them to shed blood and make lawful what was unlawful for them.
[6249]
Ibu 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Oppression is the darkness on the Day of Resurrection.
[6250]
Salim reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: A Muslim is the brother of a fellow-Muslim. He should neither commit oppression upon him nor ruin him, and he who meets the need of a brot'ier, Allah would meet big needs, and he who relieved a Muslim from hardship Allah would relieve him from the hardships to which he would be put on the Day of Resurrection, and he who did not expose (the follies of a Muslim) Allah would conceal his follies on the Day of Resurrection.
[6251]
Abu Huraira.reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do you know who is poor? They (the Companions of the Holy Prophet) said: A poor man amongst us is one who has neither dirham with him nor wealth. He (the Holy Prophet) said: The poor of my Umma would be he who would come on the Day of Resurrecton with prayers and fasts and Zakat but (he would find himself bankrupt on that day as he would have exhausted his funds of virtues) since he hurled abuses upon others, brought calumny against others and unlawfully consumed the wealth of others and shed the blood of others and beat others, and his virtues would be credited to the account of one (who suffered at his hand). And if his good deeds fall short to clear the account, then his sins would be entered in (his account) and he would be thrown in the Hell-Fire.
[6252]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The claimants would get their claims on the Day of Ressurection so much so that the hornless sheep would get its claim from the horned sheep.
[6253]
Abu Musa reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, grants respite to the oppessor.But when He lays Hand upon him, He does not then let him off. Re (the Holy Prophet) then recited this verse: "Such is the chastisement of thy Lord when He chastises the towns (inhabited by) wrongdoing persons. Surely, His punishment is painful, severe"(xi.103).
[6254]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported that two young men, one from the Muhajirin (emigrants) and the other one from the Angr (helpers) fell into dispute and the Muhajir called his fellow Muhajirin, and the Ansari (the helper) called the Ansar (for help). In the meanwhile, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came there and said: What is this, the proclamation of the days of jahiliya (ignorance)? They said: Allah's Messenger, there is nothing serious. The two young men fell into dispute and the one struck at the back of the other. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Well, a person should help his brother whether he is an oppressor or an oppressed. If he is the oppressor he should prevent him from doing it, for that is his help; and if he is the oppressed he should be helped (against oppression).
[6255]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported: We were along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in an expedition that a person from amongst the emigrants struck at the back of a person from the Ansir. The Ansiri said: O Ansar! And the Muhijir said: O Emigrants! Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: What are these proclamations of the Days of Ignorance ? They said: Allah's Messenger, a person from the emigrants struck at the back of an Ansari, whereupon he said: It is something disgusting. 'Abdullah b. Ubayy heard it and said: They have indeed done it. By Allah, when we would return to Medina the respectable amongst them (the Ansar) would turn away the mean (the emigrants). Thereupon 'Umar said: Permit me so that I should strike the neck of this hypocrite. But he (the Holy Prophet) said: Leave him, the people may not say that Muhammad kills his companions.
[6256]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported that a person from the emigrants struck the back of an Ansari. He came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and asked for compensation. Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Leave it. for it is something disgusting. Ibn Mansur said that in the narration transmitted on the authority of Amr (these words are also found) : "I heard Jabir."
[6257]
Abu Musa reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A believer is like a brick for another believer, the one supporting the other.
[6258]
Nu'man b. Bashir reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The similitude of believers in regard to mutual love, affection, fellow-feeling is that of one body; when any limb of it aches, the whole body aches, because of sleeplessness and fever.
[6259]
Nu'man b. Bashir reported a hadith like this from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him).
[6260]
Nu'man b. Bashir reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The believers are like one person; if his head aches, the whole body aches with fever and sleeplessness.
[6261]
Nu'man b. Bashir reported that Muslims are like one body of a person; if the eye is sore, the whole body aches, and if the head aches, the whole body aches.
[6262]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Nu'man b. Bashir through another chain of transmitters.
[6263]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When two persons indulge in hurling (abuses) upon one another, it would be the first one who would be the sinner so long as the oppressed does not transgress the limits.
[6264]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Charity does not in any way decrease the wealth and the servant who forgives Allah adds to his respect, and the one who shows humility Allah elevates him in the estimation (of the people).
[6265]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do you know what is backbiting? They (the Companions) said: Allah and His Messenger know best. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Backbiting implies your talking about your brother in a manner which he does not like. It was said to him: What is your opinion about this that if I actually find (that failing) in my brother which I made a mention of ? He said: If (that failing) is actually found (in him) what you assert, you in fact backbited him, and if that is not in him it is a slander.
[6266]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: The servant (whose fault) Allah conceals in this world, Allah would also conceal (his faults) on the Day of Resurrection.
[6267]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: The servant (who conceals) the faults of others in this world, Allah would conceal his faults on the Day of Resurrection.
[6268]
A'isha reported that a person sought permission from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) to see him. He said: Grant him permission. (and also added:) He is a bad son of his tribe or he is a bad person of his tribe. When he came in he used kind words for him. 'A'isha reported that she said: Allah's Messenger, you said about him what you had to say and then you treated him with kindness. He said: A'isha, verily in the eye of Allah, worst amongst the person in rank on the Day of Resurrection is one whom the people abandon or desert out of the fear of indecency.
[6269]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Ibn Munkadir with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[6270]
Jarir reported from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) : He who is deprived of tenderly feelings is in fact deprived of good.
[6271]
Jarir reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who is deprived of tenderly feelings is in fact deprived of good.
[6272]
Jarir b. 'Abdullah reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who is deprived of tenderly feelings is in fact deprived of good and he who is deprived of tenderly feelings is in fact deprived of good.
[6273]
'A'isha, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: 'A'isha, verily Allah is kind and He loves kindness and confers upon kindness which he does not confer upon severity and does not confer upon anything else besides it (kindness).
[6274]
'A'isha, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Kindness is not to be found in anything but that it adds to its beauty and it is not withdrawn from anything but it makes it defective.
[6275]
This hadith has been reported by Miqdam b. Shuraih b. Hani with the same chain of transmitters but with this addition: "'A'isha mounted upon a wild camel and she began to make that go round and round. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: You should show kindness, and then he made a mention of this hadith.
[6276]
'Imran b. Husain reported: We were with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in some of his journeys and there was a woman from the Ansar riding a she-camel that it shied and she invoked curse upon that. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) heard it and said: Unload that and set it free for it is accursed. 'Imran said: I still perceive that (dromedary) walking amongst people and none taking any notice of that.
[6277]
'Imran reported: I perceive as if I am looking towards that dromedary, and in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Thaqafi (the words are) : "Unload it and make its back bare for it is accursed."
[6278]
Abu Burza al-Aslami reported that a slave-girl was riding a dromedary and there was also the luggage of people upon it. that she suddenly saw Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). The way of the mountain was narrow and she said (to that dromedary): Go ahead (but that dromedary did not move). She (that slave-girl), out of anger, said: O Allah, let that (dromedary) be damned. Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Let the dromedary on which the curse has been invoked not proceed with us.
[6279]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Sulaiman Taimi with the same chain of transmitters but with a variation of words (and that is) : "By Allah, let that accompany us not which has been damned, or he said like it."
[6280]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: It does not seem proper for Siddiq that he should be an invoker of curse. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Kuraib with the same chain of transmitters.
[6281]
Zaid b. Aslam reported that 'Abd al-Malik b. Marwan sent some domestic goods for decoration to Umm Darda' on his own behalf, and when it was night 'Abd al-Malik got up and called for the servant. It seemed as if he (the servant) was late (in responding to his call), so he ('Abd al-Malik) invoked curse upon him, and when it was morning Umm Darda' said to him: I heard you cursing your servant during the night when you called him, and she said: I heard Abu Darda' as saying that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The invoker of curse would neither be intercessor nor witness on the Day of Resurrection.
[6282]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zaid b. Aslam with the same chain of transmitters.
[6283]
Umm Darda' reported on the authority of Abu Darda' as saying: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The invoker of curse would neither be witness nor intercessor on the Day of Resurrection.
[6284]
Abu Huraira reported it was said to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him): Invoke curse upon the polytheists, whereupon he said: I have not been sent as the invoker of curse, but "I have been sent as mercy."
[6285]
A'isha reported that two persons visited Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and both of them talked about a thing, of which I am not aware, but that annoyed him and he invoked curse upon both of them and hurled malediction, and when they went out I said: Allah's Messenger, the good would reach everyone but it would not reach these two. He said : Why so ? I said : Because you have invoked curse and hurled malediction upon both of them. He said: Don't you know that I have made condition with my Lord saying thus: O Allah, I am a human being and that for a Muslim upon whom I invoke curse or hurl malediction make it a source of purity and reward.
[6286]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmitters and the hadith transmitted on the authority of 'Isa (the words are) : "He had a private meeting with them and hurled malediction upon them and cursed them and sent them out."
[6287]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: O Allah, I am a human being and for any person amongst Muslims upon whom I hurl malediction or invoke curse or give him whipping make it a source of purity and mercy.
[6288]
Jabir reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) a hadith like it but with a slight variation of wording.
[6289]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of A'mash and in the hadith transmitted on the authority of 'Isa the words are: Make it a source of reward, and in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Abu Huraira (the words are) : "Make it a source of mercy."
[6290]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: O Allah, I make a covenant with Thee against which Thou wouldst never go. I am a human being and thus for a Muslim whom I give any harm or whom I scold or upon whom I invoke curse or whom I beat, make this a source of blessing, purification and nearness to Thee on the Day of Resurrection.
[6291]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Zinad with a slight variation of wording.
[6292]
A hadith like this has been reported on the authority of Abu Huraira through another chain of transmitters.
[6293]
Salim, the freed slave of Nasriyyin, said: I heard Abu Huraira as saying that he heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: O Allah, Muhammad is a human being. I lose my temper just as human beings lose temper, and I have held a covenant with Thee which Thou wouldst not break: For a believer whom I give any trouble or invoke curse or beat, make that an expiation (of his sins and a source of) his nearness to Thee on the Day of Resurrection.
[6294]
Abu Huraira reported that he heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: O Allah, for any believing servant whom I curse make that as a source of nearness to Thee on the Day of Resurrection.
[6295]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I have held covenant with Thee which Thou wouldst not break, so for any believer whom I curse or beat, make that an expiation on the Day of Resurrection.
[6296]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I am a human being and I have made this term with my Lord, the Exalted and Glorious: For any servant amongst Muslims whom I curse or scold, make that a source of purity and reward. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Juraij with the same chain of transmitters.
[6297]
Anas b. Malik reported that there was an orphan girl with Umm Sulaim (who was the mother of Anas). Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saw that orphan girl and said: O, it is you; you have grown young. May you not advance in years! That slave-girl returned to Umm Sulaim weeping. Umm Sulaim said: O daughter, what is the matter with you? She said: Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) has invoked curse upon me that I should not grow in age and thus I would never grow in age, or she said, in my (length) of life. Umm Sulaim went out wrapping her head-dress hurriedly until she met Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). He said to her: Umm Sulaim, what is the matter with you? She said: Allah's Apostle, you invoked curse upon my orphan girl. He said: Umm Sulaim, what is that? She said: She (the orphan girl) states you have cursed her saying that she might not grow in age or grow in life. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) smiled and then said: Umm Sulaim, don't you know that I have made this term with my Lord. And the term with my Lord is that I said to Him: I am a human being and I am pleased just as a human being is pleased and I lose temper just as a human being loses temper, so for any person from amongst my Ummah whom I curse and he in no way deserves it, let that, O Lord, be made a source of purification and purity and nearness to (Allah) on the Day of Resurrection.
[6298]
Ibn Abbas reported: I was playing with children that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) happened to pass by (us). I hid myself behind the door. He (the Holy Prophet) came and he patted upon my shoulders and said: Go and call Mu'awiya. I returned and said: He is busy in taking food. He again asked me to go and call Mu'swiya to him. I went (and came back) and said that he was busy in taking food, whereupon he said: May Allah not fill his belly! Ibn Muthanna, said: I asked Umm Umayya what he meant by the word Hatani. He said : It means "he patted my shoulders".
[6299]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Ibn Abbas with a slight variation of wording.
[6300]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The worst amongst the people is the double-faced one; he comes to some people with one face and to others with the other face.
[6301]
Abu Huraira reported that he heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The worst amongst people is one with the double face. He comes to some people with one face and to others with the other face.
[6302]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: You will find the worst amongst the people one having double face. He comes to some people with one face and to the others with the other face.
[6303]
Humaid b. 'Abd al-Rahman b. 'Auf reported that his mother Umm Kulthum daughter of 'Uqba b. Abu Mu'ait, and she was one amongst the first emigrants who pledged allegiance to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), as saying that she heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A liar is not one who tries to bring reconciliation amongst people and speaks good (in order to avert dispute), or he conveys good. Ibn Shihab said he did not hear that exemption was granted in anything what the people speak as lie but in three cases: in battle, for bringing reconciliation amongst persons and the narration of the words of the husband to his wife, and the narration of the words of a wife to her husband (in a twisted form in order to bring reconciliation between them).
[6304]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Shihab with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[6305]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Zuhri with a slight variation of wording.
[6306]
'Abdullah b. Mas'ud reported that Muhammad (may peace be upon him) said: Should I inform you that slandering, that is in fact a tale-carrying which creates dissension amongst people, (and) he (further) said: The person tells the truth until he is recorded as truthful, and lie tells a lie until lie is recorded as a liar.
[6307]
'Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Truth leads one to Paradise and virtue leads one to Paradise and the person tells the truth until he is recorded as truthful, and lie leads to obscenity and obscenity leads to Hell, and the person tells a lie until he is recorded as a liar.
[6308]
'Abdullah b. Mas'ud reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Telling of truth is a virtue and virtue leads to Paradise and the servant who endeavours to tell the truth is recorded as truthful, and lie is obscenity and obscenity leads to Hell-Fire, and the servant who endeavours to tell a lie is recorded as a liar. Ibn Abu Shaiba reported this from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him).
[6309]
'Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: It is obligatory for you to tell the truth, for truth leads to virtue and virtue leads to Paradise, and the man who continues to speak the truth and endeavours to tell the truth is eventually recorded as truthful with Allah, and beware of telling of a lie for telling of a lie leads to obscenity and obscenity leads to Hell-Fire, and the person who keeps telling lies and endeavours to tell a lie is recorded as a liar with Allah.
[6310]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmitters and no mention is made in the hadith transmitted on the authority of 'Isa (of these words) : "He who endeavours to tell the truth and endeavours to tell a lie," and in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Mushir (the words are): "Until Allah records it".
[6311]
Abdullah b. Mas'ud reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Whom do you count as "Raqub" amongst you? They (his Companions) said: One who has no children (the children are born unto him but they do not survive). Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: He is not a Raqub but Raqub is one who does not find his child as the forerunner (in Paradise). He then said: Whom do you count as a wrestler amongst you? We said: He who wrestles with persons. He said : No, it is not he but one who controls himself when in a fit of rage.
[6312]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmitters.
[6313]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The strong-man is not one who wrestles well but the strong man is one who controls himself when he is in a fit of rage.
[6314]
Abu Huraira reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: One is not strong because of one's wrestling skillfully. They said: Allah's Messenger, then who is strong? He said: He who controls his anger when he is in a fit of rage.
[6315]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Abu Huraira through another chain of transmitters.
[6316]
Sulaiman b. Surad reported that two persons abused each other in the presence of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and the eyes of one of them became red as embers and the veins of his neck were swollen. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: I know of a wording, if he were to utter that, his fit of rage (would be no more and that wording is) : I seek refuge with Allah from Satan the accursed. The person said: Do you find any madness in me? Ibn al-'Ala' said: Do you see it? And he made no mention of the person.
[6317]
Sulaiman b. Surad reported that two persons abused each other in the presence of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and one of them fell into a rage and his face became red. Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) saw him and said: I know of a wording; if he were to utter that, he would get out (of the fit of anger) (and the wording is): I seek refuge with Allah from Satan, the accursed. Thereupon, a person went to him who had heard that from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and said to him: Do you know what Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said? He (the Holy Prophet) said: I know of a wording; if he were to say that, (the fit) would be no more (and the words are): I seek refuge with Allah from Satan, the accursed. And the person said to him: Do you find me mad?
[6318]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmitters.
[6319]
Anas reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When Allah fashioned Adam in Paradise, He left him as He liked him to leave. Then Iblis roamed round him to see what actually that was and when he found him hollow from within, he recognised that he had been created with a disposition that he would not have control over himself.
[6320]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Humaid with the same chain of transmitters.
[6321]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When any one of you fights with his brother he should avoid striking at the face.
[6322]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Zinad and he said: "When one amongst you strikes (at the face)."
[6323]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: When any one of you fights with his brother, he should spare his face.
[6324]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When any one of you fights with his brother, he should not slap at the face.
[6325]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Huraira and in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Ibn Hatim Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) is reported to have said : When any one of you fights with his brother, he should avoid his face for Allah created Adam in His own image.
[6326]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When any one of you fights with his brother, he should avoid the face.
[6327]
'Urwa reported on the authority of his father that Hisham b. Hakim b. Hizam happened to pass by some people in Syria who had been made to stand in the sun and olive-oil was being poured upon their heads. He said: What is this? It was said: They are being punished for (not paying) the Kharaj (the government revenue). Thereupon he said: Allah would punish those who torment people in this world (without any genuine reason).
[6328]
Hisham reported on the authority of his father that Hisham b. Hakim b. Hizam happened to pass by people, the farmers of Syria, who had been made to stand in the sun. He said: What is the matter with them? They said: They have been detained for Jizya. Thereupon Hisham said: I bear testimony to the fact that I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah would torment those who torment people in the world.
[6329]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of transmitters and he made this addition of Jarir that (Hisham b. Hakim) went to Umair b. Sa'd who was then ruler in Palestine and he narrated to him this hadith and he (submitting before the words of the Prophet) commanded that they should be let off and so they were let off.
[6330]
'Urwa b. Zubair reported that Hisham b. Hakim found a person (the ruler of Hims) who had been detaining some Nabateans in connection with the dues of Jizya. He said: What is this? I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah would torment those persons who torment people in the world.
[6331]
'Amr heard Jabir as saying: A person happened to come to the mosque with an arrow; thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to him: Take hold of its pointed head.
[6332]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported that a person happened to come to the mosque with arrows and their iron-ends were exposed, so he was commanded that he should grasp the pointed heads so that these might not do any harm to a Muslim.
[6333]
Jabir reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded a person who had been distributing arrows freely in the mosque that he should not move about in the mosque but by catching hold of their iron-heads. Ibn Rumh narrated this with a slight variation of wording.
[6334]
Abd Musa reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: When any one of you happens to go to a meeting or the bazar with an arrow in his hand he must grasp its pointed head; then (he again said): He must grasp its pointed head. Abu Musa said: By Allah, we did not court death until some of us had flung arrows upon the faces of one another.
[6335]
Abu Musa reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) assaying: He who amongst you moves in the mosque or in the bazar and there is an arrow with him he should take hold of its iron-head in his palm, so that none amongst the Muslims should receive any injury from it, or he said, should catch its iron-head.
[6336]
Abu Huraira reported: Abu'l-Qasim (the kunya of Allah's Messenger, may peace be upon him), said: He who pointed a weapon towards his brother the angels invoke curse upon him even if he is his real brother so long as he does not abandon it (the pointing of weapon towards one's brother Muslim).
[6337]
Abu Huraira reported a hadith like this from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) through another chain of transmitters.
[6338]
Abu Huraira reported a hadith from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him); (one of them was this) that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: None amongst you should point a weapon towards his brother, for he does not know that Satan might cause the weapon (to slip) from his hand and (he may injure anyone) and thus he may fall into Hell-Fire.
[6339]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: While a person was going along the path he found a thorny branch upon it. He pushed it to a side and Allah approved (this action) of his and (as a mark of appreciation) granted him pardon.
[6340]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A person while walking along the path saw the branches of a tree lying there. He said: By Allah, I shall remove these from this so that these may not do harm to the Muslims, and he was admitted to Paradise.
[6341]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying that he saw a person enjoying himself in Paradise because of the tree that he cut from the path which was a source of inconvenience to the people.
[6342]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying that there was a tree which caused inconvenience to the Muslims; a person came there and cut that (tree) (and thus entered )Paradise).
[6343]
Abu Barza reported: I said: Allah's Messenger, teach me something so that I may derive benefit from it. He said: Remove the troublesome thing from the paths of the Muslims.
[6344]
Abu Barza reported that he said to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him): Allah's Messenger, I do not know whether I would survive after you, so confer upon me something by which Allah should benefit me. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Do this and that and remove the troublesome things from the paths.
[6345]
Abdullah reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: A woman was tormented because of a cat which she had confined until it died and she had to get into Hell. She did not allow it either to eat or drink as it was confined, nor did she free it so that it might eat the insects of the earth.
[6346]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Ibn 'Umar through another chain of transmitters. And Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying : A woman was tormented because of a cat which she had tied and thus allowed it neither to eat or drink nor set it free so that it might eat the insects of the earth.
[6347]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira through another chain of transmitters.
[6348]
Abu Huraira reported from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) A hadith out of which one was this that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: A woman got into Hell-Fire because of a cat whom she had tied, and thus it could not eat, and she did not let it free so that it could devour the insects of the earth, until it died.
[6349]
Abu Sa'id Khudri and Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, said: Glory is His lower garment and Majesty is His cloak and (Allah says,) He who contends with Me in regard to them I shall torment him.
[6350]
Jundub reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stated that a person said: Allah would not forgive such and such (person). Thereupon Allah the Exalted and Glorious, said: Who is he who adjures about Me that I would not grant pardon to so and so; I have granted pardon to so and so and blotted out his deeds (who took an oath that I would not grant pardon to him).
[6351]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) as saying: Many a person with disheveled hair and covered with dust is turned away from the doors (whereas he is held in such a high esteem by Allah) that if he were to adjure in the name of Allah (about anything) Allah would fulfil that.
[6352]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When a person says that people are ruined he is himself ruined. Abu Ishaq said: I do not know whether he said "ahlakahum or ahlakuhum.
[6353]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Suhail with the same chain of transmitters.
[6354]
'A'isha reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Gabriel impressed upon me (kind treatment) towards the neighbour (so much) that I thought as if he would confer upon him the (right) of inheritance.
[6355]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'A'isha through another chain of transmitters.
[6356]
Ibn Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Gabriel impressed upon me (the kind treatment) towards the neighbour (so much) that I thought as if he would soon confer upon him the (right) of inheritance.
[6357]
Abu Dharr reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Abu Dharr, when you prepare the broth, add water to that and give that (as a present) to your neighbour.
[6358]
Abu Dharr reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded me thus: Whenever you prepare a broth, add water to it, and have in your mind the members of the household of your neighbours and then give them out of this with courtesy.
[6359]
Abu Dharr reported: Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said to me: Don't consider anything insignificant out of good things even if it is that you meet your brother with a cheerful countenance.
[6360]
Abu Musa reported that when any needy (person) came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) with a need he commanded him to his Companions, saying: Make a recommendation for him, and you would get the reward. Allah, however, gives the verdict through the tongue of His Apostle what He likes most.
[6361]
Abu Musa reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The similitude of good company and that of bad company is that of the owner of musk and of the one (iron-smith) blowing bellows, and the owner of musk would either offer you free of charge or you would buy it from him or you would. smell its pleasant odour, and so far as one who blows the. bellows is concerned, he would either burn your clothes or you shall have to smell its repugnant smell.
[6362]
'A'isha, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), said: A woman came to me along with her two daughters. She asked me for (charity) but she found nothing with me except one date, so I gave her that. She accepted it and then divided it between her two daughters and herself ate nothing out of that. She then got up and went out, and so did her two daughters. (In the meanwhile) Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) visited me and I narrated to him her story. Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: He who is involved (in the responsibility) of (bringing up) daughters, and he accords benevolent treatment towards them, there would be protection for him against Hell-Fire.
[6363]
'A'isha reported: A poor woman came to me along with her daughters. I gave her three dates. She gave a date to each of them and then she took up one date and brought that to her mouth in order to eat that, but her daughters expressed desire to eat it. She then divided the date that she intended to eat between them. This (kind) treatment of her impressed me and I mentioned that which she did to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). Thereupon he said: Verily Allah has assured Paradise for her, because of (this act) of her, or He has rescued her from Hell-Fire.
[6364]
Malik reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He, who brought up two girls properly till they grew up, he and I would come (together) (very closely) on the Day of Resurrection, and he interlaced his fingers (for explaining the point of nearness between him and that person).
[6365]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Anyone amongst the Muslims, three of whose children die, and he resigns himself calmly to the will of God, Fire will not touch him but for the fulfilment of the oath.
[6366]
This hadith has been reported by Zuhri on the authority of Malik, and in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Sufyan (the words are) : "He would enter into Fire, except for the fulfilment of the oath."
[6367]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to a woman of the Ansar: In case anyone amongst you sees the sad demise of three children of (hers) and she resigns herself to the will of God hoping to get reward, she would be admitted to Paradise. A woman from amongst them said: Allah's Messenger, even if they (the children who die) are two. Thereupon, he (the Holy Prophet,) said: Even if they are two.
[6368]
Abu Sa'id Khudri reported that a woman came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger, men receive your instructions; kindly allocate at your convenience a day for us also, on which we would come to you and you would teach us what Allah has taught you. He said: You assemble on such and such a day. They assembled and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to them and taught them what Allah had taught him and he then said: No woman amongst you who sends her three children as her forerunners (in the Hereafter) but they would serve him as a protection against Hell-Fire. A woman said: What about two and two and two? Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Even if they are two and two and two.
[6369]
Abu Huraira reported that he (the Holy Prophet) said: Three (children) who die in childhood.
[6370]
Abu Hassan reported : I said to Abu Huraira that my two children had died. Would you narrate to me anything from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) a hadith which would soothe our hearts in our bereavements ? He said: Yes. Small children are the fowls of Paradise. If one of them meets his father (or he said his parents) he would take hold of his cloth, or he said with his hand as I take hold of the hem of your cloth (with my hand). And he (the child) would not take off (his hand) from it until Allah causes his father to enter Paradise. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Tamim with the same chain of transmitters. And he is reported to have said: Did you hear from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) anything which may soothe our heart in our bereavements? He said: Yes.
[6371]
Abu Huraira reported that a woman came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) with her child and said: Allah's Apostle, invoke Allah's blessing upon him for I have already buried three. He said: You have buried three! She said: Yes. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said : You have, indeed, safeguarded yourself against the torment of Hell with a strong safeguard. 'Umar has made a mention of his father, whereas others have not made a mention of his father.
[6372]
Abu Huraira reported that a woman came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) with her child and said: Allah's Messenger, he is ailing, and I am afraid (that he may die), as I have already buried three. Thereupon he said: It (their sad demise) would be a protection against Hell-Fire for you. Zuhair has not mentioned the kunya of Abu Ghiyath; he has mentioned his name.
[6373]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: When Allah loves a servant, He calls Gabriel and says: Verily, I so and so; you should also love him, and then Gabriel begins to love him. Then he makes an announcement in the heaven saying: Allah loves so and so and you also love him, and then the inhabitants of the Heaven (the Angels) also begin to love him and then there is conferred honour upon him in the earth; and when Allah is angry with any servant He calls Gabriel and says: I am angry with such and such and you also become angry with him, and then Gabriel also becomes angry and then makes an announcement amongst the inhabitants of heaven: Verily Allah is angry with so-and so, so you also become angry with him, and thus they also become angry with him. Then he becomes the object of wrath on the earth also.
[6374]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Suhail with the same chain of transmitters except with this variation that in the hadith transmitted on the authority of 'Ali' b. Musayyib, there is no mention of (the word) "Anger".
[6375]
Suhail b. Abi Salih, reported: We were in Arafa that there happened to pass Umar b. Abd al-'Aziz and he was the Amir of Hajj. People stood up in order to catch a glimpse of him. I said to my father: Father, I think that Allah loves Umar b. Abd al- 'Aziz. He said: How is it? I said: It is because of the love in people's heart for him. Thereupon he said: By One Who created your father, I heard Abu Huraira narrating from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) a hadith like one transmitted on the authority of Suhail.
[6376]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) Saying: Souls are troops collected together and those who familiarised with each other (in the heaven from where these come) would have affinity, with one another (in the world) and those amongst them who opposed each other (in the Heaven) would also be divergent (in the world).
[6377]
Abu Huraira narrated directly from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) that he said: People are like mines of gold and silver; those who were excellent in Jahiliya (during the days of ignorance) are excellent In Islam, when they have, an understanding, and the souls are troops collected together and those who had a mutual familiarity amongst themselves in the store of prenatal existence would have affinity amongst them, (in this world also) and those who opposed one of them, would be at variance with one another.
[6378]
Anas b. Malik reported that a desert Arab said to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) : When would be the Last Hour? Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: What preparation have you made for that? Thereupon he said: The love of Allah and of His Messenger (that is my preparation for the Last Hour) (for the Day of Resurrection). Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: You would be along with one whom you love.
[6379]
Anas reported that a person said to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him): When would be the Last Hour? He (the Holy Prophet) said: What preparation have you made for that? And he gave no details, but said: I love Allah and His Messenger. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: You would be along with one whom you love. Anas b. Malik reported through another chain of transmitters that a desert Arab came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon, him), the rest of the hadith is the same but with this variation that he said: I have not made much preparations which merit appreciation for myself.
[6380]
Anas b. Malik reported that a person came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said to Allah's Messenger: When would be the Last Hour? Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: What preparation have you made for the Last Hour? He said: The love of Allah and of His Messenger (is my only preparation). Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: You would be along with one whom you love. Anas said: Nothing pleased us more after accepting Islam than the words of Allah's Apostle: You would be along with one whom you love. And Anas said. I love Allah and His Messenger and Abu Bakr and Umar, and I hope that I would be along with them although I have not acted like them.
[6381]
Anas b. Malik reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) this hadith through another chain of transmitters but he did not make mention of the words of Anas: I love, and what follows subsequently.
[6382]
Anas b. Malik reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and I were coming out of the mosque that we met a person on the threshold of the mosque and he said to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him): When would be the Last Hour? Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: What preparation have you made for that ? The man became silent and then said: Allah's Messenger, I have made no significant preparation with prayer and fasting and charity but I, however, love Allah and His Messenger. Thereupon (the Holy Prophet) said: You would be along with one whom you love.
[6383]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Anas through another chain of transmitters.
[6384]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Anas with a different chain of transmitters.
[6385]
'Abdullah reported that a person came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) : What is your opinion about the person who loves the people but his (acts or deeds are not identical to theirs) ? Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: A person would be along with one whom he loves.
[6386]
A hadith like this has been transmitted on the authority of 'Abdullah.
[6387]
Abu Musa, reported that a person came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) ; the rest of the hadith is the same.
[6388]
Abu Dharr reported: It was said to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him): What is your opinion about the person who has done good deeds and the people praise him ? He said: It is glad tidings for a believer (which he has received in this mortal world).
[6389]
This hadith has been narrated through another chain of transmitters also and the one transmitted on the authority of Shu'ba (the words are) : "People love him." In the hadith transmitted on the authority of 'Abd-us-Samad (the words are): "People praise him as stated by Hammad."
[6390]
Abdullah (b. Mas'ud) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) who is the most truthful (of the human beings) and his being truthful (is a fact) said: Verily your creation is on this wise. The constituents of one of you are collected for forty days in his mother's womb in the form of blood, after which it becomes a clot of blood in another period of forty days. Then it becomes a lump of flesh and forty days later Allah sends His angel to it with instructions concerning four things, so the angel writes down his livelihood, his death, his deeds, his fortune and misfortune. By Him, besides Whom there is no god, that one amongst you acts like the people deserving Paradise until between him and Paradise there remains but the distance of a cubit, when suddenly the writing of destiny overcomes him and he begins to act like the denizens of Hell and thus enters Hell, and another one acts in the way of the denizens of Hell, until there remains between him and Hell a distance of a cubit that the writing of destiny overcomes him and then he begins to act like the people of Paradise and enters Paradise.
[6391]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmitters and in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Waki' (the words are) : "The creation of any one of you is like this that (semen) is collected in the womb of the mother for forty nights," and in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Shu'ba (the words are) : "Forty nights and forty days." And in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Jarir and 'Isa (the words are) : "Forty days."
[6392]
Hudhaifa b. Usaid reported directly from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) that lie said: When the drop of (semen) remains in the womb for forty or fifty (days) or forty nights, the angel comes and says : My Lord, will he be good or evil ? And both these things would be written. Then the angel says: My Lord, would he be male or female ? And both these things are written. And his deeds and actions, his death, his livelihood; these are also recorded. Then his document of destiny is rolled and there is no,addition to and subtraction from it.
[6393]
'Abdullah b. Mas'ud reported: Evil one is he who is evil in the womb of his mother and the good one is he who takes lesson from the (fate of) others. The narrator came to a person from amongst the Companion of Allah's Me ssenger (may peace be upon him) who was called Hudhaifa b. Usaid Ghifari and said: How can a person be an evil one without (cornmittilng an evil) deed? Thereupon the person said to him: You are surprised at this, whereas I have heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saving: When forty nights pass after the semen gets into the womb, Allah sends the angel and gives him the shape. Then he creates his sense of hearing, sense of sight, his skin, his flesh, his bones, and then says: My Lord, would he be male or female ? And your Lord decides as He desires and the angel then puts down that also and then says: My Lord, what about his age? And your Lord decides as He likes it and the angel puts it down. Then he says: My Lord, what about his livelihood? And then the Lord decides as He likes and the angel writes it down, and then the angel gets out with his scroll of destiny in his hand and nothing is added to it and nothing is subtracted from it.
[6394]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Abdullah b. Mas'ud through another chain of transmitters.
[6395]
Abu Tufail reported: I visited Abu Sariha Hudhaifa b. Usaid al-Ghifari who said : I listened with these two ears of mine Allahs Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The semen stays in the womb for forty nights, then the angel, gives it a shape. Zubair said: I think that he said: One who fashions that and decides whether he would be male or female. Then he (the angel) says: Would his limbs be full or imperfect ? And then the Lord makes thein full and perfect or otherwise as He desires. Then he says: My Lord, what about his livelihood, and his death and what about his disposition? And then the Lord decides about his misfortune and fortune.
[6396]
Hadhaifa b. Usaid Ghifari, a Companion of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), reported it directly from Allah's Messenger (may peace upon him).as he said: There is an angel who looks after the womb when Allah decides to create any- thing after more than forty nights are over; the rest of the hadith is the same.
[6397]
Anas b. Malik reported directly from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) that he said: Allah, the Exlated and Glorious, has appointed an angel as the caretaker of the womb, and he would say: My Lord, it is now a drop of semen; my Lord, It is now a clot of blood; my Lord, it has now become a lump of flesh, and when Allah decides to give it a final shape, the angel says: My Lord, would it be male or female or would he be an evil or a good person? What about his livelihood and his age? And it is all written as he is in the womb of his mother.
[6398]
All reported: We were in a funeral in the graveyard of Gharqad that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to us and we sat around him. He had a stick with him. He lowered his head and began to scratch the earth with his stick, and then raid: There is not one amongst you whom a scat in Paradise or Hell has not been allotted and about whom it has not been written down whether he would be an evil person or a blessed person. A person said: Allah's Messenger, should we not then depend npon our destiny and abandon our deeds? Thereupon he said: Acts of everyone will be facilitated in, that which has been created for him so that whoever belongs to the com. pany of the blessed will have good works made easier for himand whoever belongs to the unfortunate ones will have evil acts made easier for him. He then recited this verse (from the Qur'an): "Then, who gives to the needy and guardsagainst evil and accepts the excellent (the truth of Islam and the path of righteousness it prescribes), We shall make easy for him the easy end and who is miserly and considers himself above need, We shall make easy for him the dificult end". (XCii. 5-10).
[6399]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Mansur with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[6400]
'Ali reported that one day Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was sitting with a wood in his hand and he was scratching the ground. He raised his head and said: There is not one amongst you who has not been allotted his seat in Paradise or Hell. They said: Allah's Messenger. then, why should we perform good deeds, why not depend upon our destiny? Thereupon he said. No, do perform good deeds, for everyone is facilitated in that for which he has been created ; then he recited this verse: "Then, who gives to the needy and guards against evil and accepts the excellent (the truth of Islam and the path of righteousness it prescribes), We shall make easy for him the easy end . . . " (xcii. 5-10).
[6401]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Ali through another chain of transmitters.
[6402]
Jabir reported that Suriqa b. Malik b. Ju'shuin came and said: Allah's Messenger, explain our religion to us (in a way) as if we have been created just now. Whosoever deeds we do today, is it because of the fact that-the pens have dried (after recording them) and the destitiles have began to operate or these have effects in future? Thereupon he said: The pens have dried tmd destinies have begun to operate. (Suraqa b. Malik) said: If it Is so, then what is the use of doing good deeds? Zuhair said: Then Abu Zubair said something but I could not understand that and I said. What did he say? Thereupon he said: Act, for everyone is facilitated what he intends to do.
[6403]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Jabir b. Abdullah with the same wording (and includes these words) : " Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Every doer of deed is facilitated in his action."
[6404]
'Imran b. Husain repotted that it was said to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him): Has there been drawn a distinction between the people of Paradise and the denizens of hell? He said: Yes. It was again said: (If it is so), then What is the use of doing good deeds ? Thereupon he said: Everyone is facilitated in what has been created for him.
[6405]
This hadith has been narrated through other chains of transmiters with slight variations of wording.
[6406]
Abu al-Aswad reported that 'Imran b Husain asked him: What is your view, what the people do today in the world, and strive for, is it something decreed for them or preordained for them or will their fate in the Hereafter be deterrained by the fact that their Prophets brought them teaching which they did not act upon ? I said: Of course, it is something which is predetermined for them and preordained for them. He (further) said: Then, would it not be an injustice (to punish them) ? I felt greatly disturbed because of that, and said: Everything is created by Allah and lies in His Power. He would not be questioned as to what He does, but they would be questioned; thereupon he said to me: May Allah have mercy upon you, I did not mean to ask you but for testing your intelligence. Two men of the tribe of Muzaina came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger, what is your opinion that the people do in the world and strive for, is something decreed for them; something preordained for them and will their fate in the Hereafter be determined by the fact that their Prophets brought them teachings which they did not act upon. and thus they became deserving of punishment ? Thereupon, he said: Of course, it happens as it is decreed by Destiny and preordained for them, and this view is confirmed by this verse of the Book of Allah, the Exalted and Glorious: "Consider the soul and Him Who made it perfect, then breathed into it its sin and its piety" (xci. 8).
[6407]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) as saying: Verily, a person performs deeds for a long time like the deeds of the people of Paradise. Then his deeds are terminated like the deeds of the people of Hell and, verily, a person performs deeds like the denizens of Fire for a long time, and then this deed of his is ultimately followed by the deeds of the people of Paradise.
[6408]
Sahl b. Sa'd reported it from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) that a person performs deeds like the deeds of the people of Paradise apparently before people and he would be amongst the dwellers of Hell and a person acts apparently like the people of Hell, but (in fact) he would be among the dwellers of Paradise.
[6409]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) as saying: There was argument between Adam and Moses. Moses said to Adam: You are our father. You did us harm and caused us to get out of Paradise. Adam said to him: You are Moses. Allah selected you (for direct conversation with you) and wrote with His own Hand the Book (Torah) for you. Despite this you blame me for an act which Allah had ordained for me forty years before He created me. Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said:.This is how Adam came the better of Moses and Adam came the better of Moses.
[6410]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There was argument between Adam and Moses, and Adam came the better of Moses. Moses said to him : You are the same Adam who misled people, and caused them to get out of Paradise. Adam said: You are the same (Moses) whom Allah endowed the knowledge of everything and selected him amongst the people as His Messenger. He said: Yes. Adam then again said: Even then you blame me for an affair which had been ordained for me before I was created.
[6411]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There was an argument between Adam and Moses (peace be upon both of them) in the presence of their Lord. Adam came the better of Moses. Moses said : Are you that Adam whom Allah created with His Hand and breathed into himHis sprit, and commanded angels to fall in prostration before him and He made you live in Paradise with comfort and ease. Then you caused the people to get down to the earth because of your lapse. Adam said: Are you that Moses whom Allah selected for His Messengership and for His conversation with him and conferred upon you the tablets, in which everything was clearly explained and granted you the audience in order to have confidential talk with you. What is your opinion, how long Torah would haye been written before I was created ? Moses said: Forty years before. Adam said: Did you not see these words: Adam committed an error and he was enticed to (do so). He (Moses) said: Yes. Whereupon, he (Adam) said: Do you then blame me for an act which Allah had ordained for me forty years before He created me ? Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said : This is how Adam came the better of Moses.
[6412]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There was an argument between Adam and Moses. Moses said: Are you that Adam whose lapse caused you to get out of Paradise ? Adam said to him: Are you that Moses whom Allah selected for His Messengership, for His conversation and you blame me for an affair which had been ordained for me before I was created ? This is how Adam came the better of Moses.
[6413]
Abu Huraira narrated a hadith like this through another chain of transmitters.
[6414]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira through another chain of transmitters.
[6415]
Abu Huraira reported a hadith like this through another chain of transmitters.
[6416]
Abdullah b. 'Amr b. al-'As reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying : Allah ordained the measures (of quality) of the creation fifty thousand years before He created the heavens and the earth, as His Throne was upon water.
[6417]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Hani with the same chain of transmitters, but there is no mention of "His Throne was upon water."
[6418]
Abdullah b. Amr b. al-'As reported that he heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Verily, the hearts of all the sons of Adam are between the two fingers out of the fingers of the Compassionate Lord as one heart. He turns that to any (direction) He likes. Then Allahs Messenger (may peace be upon him) said : 0 Allah, the Turner of the hearts, turn our hearts to Thine obedience.
[6419]
Tawus reported: I found some Companions of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Everything is by measure. And he further said: I heard Abdullah b. 'Umar as saying: There is a neasure for everything-even for incapacity and-capability.
[6420]
Abu Huraira reported that the polytheists of the Quraish came to have an argument with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in regard to Destiny and then this verse was revealed: "On the day when they are dragged into the Fire upon their faces , taste the touch of Fire. Surely, We have created everything according to a measure" (liv. 48).
[6421]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Verily Allah has fixed the very portion of adultery which a man will indulge in, and which he of necessity must comrriit. The adultery of the eye is the lustful look, and the adultery of the tongue is the licentious speech, the heart desires and yearns, which the parts may or may not put into effect.
[6422]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying. Allah fixed the very portion of adultery which a man will indulge in. There would be no escape from it. The adultery of the eye is the lustful look and the adultery of the ears is listening to voluptuous (song or talk) and the adultery of the tongue is licentious speech and the adultery of the hand is the lustful grip (embrace) and the adultery of the feet is to walk (to the place) where he intends to commit adultery and the heart yearns and desires which he may or may not put into effect.
[6423]
There is none born but is created to his true nature (Islam). It is his parents who make him a Jew or a Christian or a Magian quite as beasts produce their young with their limbs perfect. Do you see anything deficient in them? Then he quoted the Qur'an. ,The nature made by Allah in which He has created men there is no altering of Allah's creation ; that is the right religion" (xxx. 33)
[6424]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters and there is no mention of his deficiency in limbs.
[6425]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: No child is born but upon Fitra. He then said. Recite: The nature made by Allah in which He created man, there is no altering of Allah's nature; that is the right religion."
[6426]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: No babe is born but upon Fitra. It is his parents who make him a Jew or a Christian or a Polytheist. A person said: Allah's Messenger, what is your opinion if they were to die before that (before reaching the age of adolescence when they can distinguish between right and wrong) ? He said: It is Allah alone Who knows what they would be doing.
[6427]
It is reported on the authority of Abu Mu'awiya that (the Holy Prophet) said: Every new-born babe is born on the millat (of Islam and he) remains on this until his tongue is enabled to express himself.
This hadith has been narratted on the authority of Abu Mu'awiya through another chain of transmitters (and the words are) : "Every child is born but on this Fitra so long as he does not express himself with his tongue."
[6428]
Abu Huraira reported from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upom him) many ahadith and one amongst them is that he is reported to have said: An infant is born according to his (true) nature. It is his parents Who make him a Jew, a Christian, just as a she-camel gives birth to its young ones. Do you find any deficiency in their limbs? You cut their ears (i.e. after birth). They (the Companions of the Holy Prophet) said: What is your opinion about him who dies in infancy? Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: It is Allah alone Who knows best what they would be doing.
[6429]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The mother of every person gives him birth according to his true nature. It is subsequently his parents who make him a Jew or a Christian or a Magian. Had his parents been Muslim he would have also remained a Muslim. Every person to whom his mother gives birth (has two aspects of his life) ; when his mother gives birth Satan strikes him but it was not the case with Mary and her son (Jesus Christ).
[6430]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was asked about the children of the polytheists, whereupon he said: It is Allah Who knows best what they would be doing.
[6431]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Shu'aib and Ma'qil with a slight variation of wording.
[6432]
Abu Huraira reported that Allahs Messenger (way peace be upon him) was asked about the children of the polytheists who die young. Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: It is Allah Who knows what they would be doing.
[6433]
Ibn Abbas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was asked about the children of the polytheists, whereupon he said: It is Allah alone Who knows what they would be doing according to their creation.
[6434]
Ubayy b. Ka'b reported that AUah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The young man whom Khadir killed was a non-believer by his very nature and had he survived he would have involved his parents in defiance and unbelief.
[6435]
'A'isha, the mother of the believers, reported that a child died and I said: There is happiness for this child who is a bird from amongst the birds of Paradise. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Don't you know that Allah created the Paradise and He created the Hell and He created the dwellers for this (Paradise) and the denizens for this (Hell)?
[6436]
'A'isha, the mother of the believers, said that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was called to lead the funeral prayer of a child of the Ansar. I said: Allah's Messenger, there is happiness for this child who is a bird from the birds of Paradise for it committed no sin nor has he reached the age when one can commit sin. He said: 'A'isha, per adventure, it may be otherwise, because God created for Paradise those who are fit for it while they were yet in their father's loins and created for Hell those who are to go to Hell. He created them for Hell while they were yet in their father's loins.
[6437]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Yahya with the same chain of transmitters.
[6438]
Abdullah reported that Umm Habiba, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), said: 0 Allah, enable me to derive benefit from my husband, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), and from my father Abu Sufyan and from my brother Mu'awiya. Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: You have asked from Allah about durations of life already set, and the length of days already allotted and the sustenances the share of which has been fixed. Allah would not do anything earlier before its due time, or He would not delay anything beyond its due time. And if you were to ask Allah to provide you refuge from the torment of the HellFire, or from the torment of the grave, it would have good in store for you and better for you also. He (the narrator) further said: Mention was made before him about monkeys, and Mis'ar (one of the narrators) said: I think that (the narrator) also (made a mention) of the swine, which had suffered metamorphosis. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Verily, Allah did not cause the race of those which suffered metamorphosis to grow or they were not survived by young ones. Monkeys and swine had been in existence even before (the metamorphosis of the human beings).
[6439]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Mis'ar with the same chain of transmitters but with this variation that the hadith transmitted on the authority of Ibn Bishr and Waki', the torment of the Hell-Fire and the torment of grave have been mentioned together (and there is no conjunction "iw" or" between them).
[6440]
Ibn Mas'dd reported that Umm Habiba said: 0 Allah, enable me to derive benefit from my husband, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and from my father Abu Sufyan, and from my brother Mu'awiya. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to her: Verily, you have asked Allah about the durations of life already set, and the steps which you would take, and the sustenances the share of which is fixed. Nothing would take place earlier than its due time, and nothing would be deferred beyond that when it is due. So, if you were to ask Allah about your safety from the torment of Hell-Fire and from the torment of the grave, it would have been better for you. A person said: Allah's Messenger, what about those apes and swine which suffered metamorphosis? Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Verily, Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, did not destroy a people or did not torment a people, and let their race grow. Apes and swine had been even before that (when the deniers of truth were tormented and suffered metamorphosis). This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Sufyin through another chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[6441]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A strong believer is better and is more lovable to Allah than a weak believer, and there is good in everyone, (but) cherish that which gives you benefit (in the Hereafter) and seek help from Allah and do not lose heart, and if anything (in the form of trouble) comes to you, don't say : If I had not done that, it would not have happened so and so, but say: Allah did that what He had ordained to do and your "if" opens the (gate) for the Satan.
[6442]
'A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) recited (these verses of the Qur'an) : "He it is Who revealed to thee (Muhammad) the Book (the Qur'an) wherein there are clear revelations-these are the substance of the Book and others are allegorical (verses). And as for those who have a yearning for error they go after the allegorical verses seeking (to cause) dissension, by seeking to explain them. And none knows their implications but Allah, and those who are sound in knowledge say: We affirm our faith in everything which is from our Lord. It is only the persons of understanding who really heed" (iii. 6). 'A'isha (further) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said (in connection with these verses) : When you see such verses, avoid them, for it is they whom Allah has pointed out (in the mentioned verses).
[6443]
'Abdullah b. 'Umar reported: I went to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in the morning and he heard the voice of two persons who had an argumenta- tion with each other about a verse. Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) came to us (and) the (signs) of anger could be seen on his face. He said: Verily, the (peoples) before you were ruined because of their disputation in the Book.
[6444]
Jundub b. 'Abdullah al-Bajali reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Recite the Qur'an as long as your hearts agree to do so, and when you feel variance between them (between your hearts and tongues), then get up (and leave its recital for the time being).
[6445]
Jundub (i.e. Ibn 'Abdullah) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Recite the Qur'an as long as your hearts agree to do so and when you find variance between them, then stand up.
[6446]
Abu Imran reported that Jundub told us as we we-re young boys living in Kilfa, that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had said: Recite the Qur'an. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[6447]
'A'isha reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The most despicable amongst persons in the eye of Allah is one who tries to fall into dispute with others (for nothing but only to display his knowledge and power of argumentation).
Chapter : FOLLOWING THE FOOTSTEPS OF THE JEWS AND THE CHRISTIANS
[6448]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: You would tread the same path as was trodden by those before you inch by inch and step by step so much so that if they had entered into the hole of the lizard, you would follow them in this also. We said: Allah's Messenger, do you mean Jews and Christians (by your words) "those before you" ? He said: Who else (than those two religious groups) ?
[6449]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Ata' b. Yasir through another chain of transmitters.
[6450]
Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Ruined,were those who indulged in hair-splitting. He (the Holy Prophet) repeated this thrice.
[6451]
Anas b. Malik reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: It is from the conditions of the Last Hour that knowledge would be taken away and ignorance would prevail (upon the world), the liquor would be drunk, and adultery would become rainpant.
[6452]
Qatida reported that Anas b. Malik said: May I not narrate to you a hadith which I heard from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) which no one would narrate to you after me who would have personally heard it from him (the Holy Prophet) (as I have the good fortune to do so)?-" It is from the signs of the Last Hour that knowledge would be taken away, ignorance would prevail upon (the world), adultery would become common, wine would be drunk, the number of men will fall short and the women would survive (and thus such a disparity would arise in the number of men and women) that there would be one man to look after fifty women.
[6453]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Anas b. Malik through another chain of narrators, but with a slight variation of wording.
[6454]
Abu Wa'il reported: I was sitting with 'Abdullah and Abu Musa that they reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said: Prior to the Last Hour, there would be a time when knowledge would be taken away, and ignorance would take its place and there would be bloodshed on a large scale.
[6455]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Abdullah (b. Mas'ud) and Abu Musa (al-Asha'ri) through other chains of transmitters.
[6456]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Abu Musa through another chain of transmitters.
[6457]
Abu Wa'il reported: I was sitting with Abu Musa and 'Abdullah and they were conversing with each other and Abu Musa reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying (that we find in the above-mentioned ahadith).
[6458]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: (When) the time would draw close to the Last Hour, knowledge would be snatched away, turmoil would be rampant, miserliness would be put (in the hearts of the people) and therewould be much bloodshed. They said: What is al-harj? Thereupon he said: It is bloodshed.
[6459]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Huraira with a slight variation of wording.
[6460]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said: The time would draw close to the Last Hour and knowledge would decrease. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[6461]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Huraira through other chains of narrators and there is no mention of : "Miserliness would be put (in the hearts of the people)."
[6462]
'Abdullah b. 'Amr b. al-'As reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Verily, Allah does nit take away knowledge by snatching it from the people but Re takes away knowledge by taking away the scholars, so that when He leaves no learned person, people turn to ignorant as their, leaders; then they are asked to deliver religious verdicts and they deliver them without knowledge, they go astray, and lead others astray.
[6463]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Abdullah b. Umar through other chains of transmitters, but in the hadith transmitted by Umar b. 'Ali there is an addition of these words: ,I met 'Abdullah b. 'Amr at the end of the year and I asked him about it, and he narrated to us the hadith as he had narrated before that he had heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying.... (The rest of the hadith is the same).
[6464]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Abdullah b. Amr b. al-'As through another chain of transmitters.
[6465]
'Urwa b. Zubair reported that 'A'isha said to him: This news has reached me that 'Abdullah b. 'Amr al-'As would pass by us during the Hajj season, so you meet him and ask him (about religious matters)as he has acquired great knowledge from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). I thus met him and asked him about things which he narrated from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). And amongst these the one he mentioned was that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Verily, Allah does not take away knowledge from people directly but he takes away the scholars and consequently takes away (knowledge) along with them and leaves amongst persons the ignorant as their leaders who deliver religious verdicts without (adequate) knowledge and themselves go astray and lead others astray. 'Urwa said: When I narrated this to 'A'isha, she deemed it too much (to believe) and thus showed reluctance to accept that (as perfectly true) and said to, 'Urwa: Did he ('Abdullah b. 'Amr) say to you that he had heard Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: ('Urwa had forgotten to ask this from 'Abdullah b. 'Amr). So when it was the next year, she ('A'isha) said to him ('Urwa): Ibn Amr has come (for Hajj), so meet him. talk to him and ask him about this hadith that he narrated to You (last year on the occasion of the Hajj) pertaining to knowledge. He ('Urwa), said: So I met him, and asked about it and he narrated to me exactly like one that he had narrated (to me) for the first time. So when I informed her ('A'isha) about that, she said: I do not think but this that he has certainly told the truth and I find that be has neither made any addition to it, nor missed anything from it.
[6466]
Jarir b. Abdullah reported that some desert Arabs clad in woollen clothes came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). He saw them in sad plight as they had been hard pressed by need. He (the Holy Prophet) exhorted people to give charity, but they showed some reluctance until (signs) of anger could be seen on his face. Then a person from the Ansar came with a purse containing silver. Then came another person and then other persons followed them in succession until signs of happiness could be seen on his (sacred) face. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: He who introduced some good practice in Islam which was followed after him (by people) he would be assured of reward like one who followed it, without their rewards being diminished in any respect. And he who introduced some evil practice in Islam which had been followed subsequently (by others), he would be required to bear the burden like that of one who followed this (evil practice) without their's being diminished in any respect.
[6467]
Jarir reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) delivered an address in which he exhorted people to give charity.
[6468]
Jarir b. 'Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The servant does not introduce good practice which is followed after him.... The rest of the hadith is the same.
[6469]
Jarir transmitted this hadith from his father through another chain of narrators.
[6470]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who called (people) to righteousness, there would be reward (assured) for him like the rewards of those who adhered to it, without their rewards being diminished in any respect. And he who called (people) to error, he shall have to carry (the burden) of its sin, like those who committed it, without their sins being diminished in any respect.
[6471]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying that Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, thus stated : I am near to the thought of My servant as he thinks about Me, and I am with him as he remembers Me. And if he remembers Me in his heart, I also remember him in My Heart, and if he remembers Me in assembly I remember him in assembly, better than his (remembrance), and if he draws near Me by the span of a palm, I draw near him by the cubit, and if he draws near Me by the cubit I draw near him by the space (covered by) two hands. And if he walks towards Me, I rush towards him.
[6472]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmitters, but there is no mention of these words: "He draws near Me by the space of a hand, I draw near him by the space (covered) by two hands."
[6473]
Hammam b. Munabbih reported so many ahadith from Abu Huraira and one out of them is this that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said that Allah thus stated: When My servant draws close to me by the span of a palm, I draw close to him by the space of a cubit, and when he draws close to Me by the space of a cubit, I draw close to him by the space (covered) by two hands, and when he draws close to Me by the space (covered by) two hands, I go in hurry towards him.
[6474]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was travelling along the path leading to Mecca that he happened to pass by a mountain called Jumdan. He said: Proceed on, it is Jumdan, Mufarradun have gone ahead. They (the Companions of the Holy Prophet) said: Allah's Messenger, who are Mufarradun? He said: They are those males and females who remember Allah much.
[6475]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There are ninety-nine names of Allah; he who commits them to memory would get into Paradise. Verily, Allah is Odd (He is one, and it is an odd number) and He loves odd number. And in the narration of Ibn 'Umar (the words are) : "He who enumerated them."
[6476]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Verily, there are ninety-nine names for Allah, i.e. hundred excepting one. He who enumerates them would get into Paradise. And Hammam has made this addition on the authority of Abu Huraira who reported it from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) that he said: "He is Odd (one) and loves odd number."
[6477]
Anas reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When one of you makes supplication, he should supplicate with a will and should not say: O Allah, confer upon me if Thou likest, for there is none to coerce Allah.
[6478]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When one of you makes a supplication (to his Lord) one should not say: O Allah, grant me pardon, if Thou so likest, but one should beg one's (Lord) with a will and full devotion, for there is nothing so great in the eye of Allah which He cannot grant.
[6479]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: None of you should say to Allah (like this): O Allah, grant me mercy, if thou so likest. The supplication (of his) should (be permeated with) conviction (that it would be accepted by the Lord), for Allah is the Doer of (everything) He likes to do, and there is none to force Him (to do or not to do this or that).
[6480]
Anas (b. Malik) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying. None of you should make a request for death because of the trouble in which he is involved, but if there is no other help to it, then say: O Allah, keep me alive as long as there is goodness in life for me and bring death to me when there is goodness in death for me.
[6481]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Anas through another chain of transmitters, but with a small variation of wording.
[6482]
Nadr b. Anas reported, as when Anas was alive, that he said: Had Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) not stated this.. "None should make a request for death," I would have definitely done that.
[6483]
Abu Hazim reported: I visited Khabbab who bad seven cauteries on his stomach and he s aid: Had Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) not forbidden us to call for death, I would have done so.
[6484]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Isma'il through other chains of narrators.
[6485]
Hammam b. Munabbih said: Abu Huraira narrated to us ahadith from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and out of these one is that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: None amongst you should make a request for death, and do not call for it before it comes, for when any one of you dies, he ceases (to do good) deeds and the life of a believer is not prolonged but for goodness.
[6486]
Ubida b. Samit reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who loves to meet Allah, Allah also loves to meet him, and he who dislikes to meet Allah, Allah also abhors to meet him.
[6487]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Ubada b. Samit through another chain of transmitters.
[6488]
A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: He who loves to meet Allah, Allah loves to meet him, and he who dislikes to meet Allah, Allah abhors to meet him. I ('A'isha) said : Allah's Apostle, so far as the feeling of aversion against death is concerned, we all have this feeling. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: It is not that (which you construe), but (this) that when a believer (at the time of death) is given the glad tidings of the mercy of Allah, His Pleasure, and of Paradise, he loves to meet Allah, and Allah also loves to meet him, and when an unbeliever is given the news of the torment at the Hand of Allah, and Hardship to be imposed by Him, he dislikes to meet Allah and Allah also abhors to meet him.
[6489]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Qatida with the same chain of transmitters.
[6490]
'A'isha reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who loves to meet Allah, Allah also loves to meet him, and who dislikes to meet Allah, Allah abhors to meet him. There is death before (one is able to) meet Allah.
[6491]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of A'isha through another chain of transmitters.
[6492]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who loves meeting Allah, Allah loves to meet him, and he who dislikes to meet Allah, Allah abhors to meet him. I (Shuraih b. Hani, one of the narrators) came to A'isha and said to her: Mother of the faithful, I heard Abu Huraira narrate from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) which, if it is actually so, is a destruction to us. Thereupon she said: Those are in fact ruined who are ruined at the words of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). What are (the words which in your opinion would cause your destruction)? He said that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had stated: He who loves to meet Allah, Allah too loves to meet him, and he who dislikes to meet Allah, Allah too abhors to meet him, and there is none amongst us who dons not hate death. Thereupon she said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) has in fact stated this, but it does not mean what you construe, but it implies (the time) when one loses the lustre of the eye, and there is rattling in the throat, shudder in the body and convulsion in fingers (at the time of death). (It is about this time) that it has been said: He who loves to meet Allah, Allah would love to meet him, and he who dislikes to meet Allah, Allah would abhor to meet him
[6493]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Mutarrif with the same chain of transmitters.
[6494]
Abu Musa reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who loves to meet Allah, Allah too loves to meet him, and he who dislikes to meet Allah, Allah abhors to meet him.
[6495]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him as saying that Allah thus stated: I live in the thought of My servant as he thinks of Me and with him as he calls Me.
[6496]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying that Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, said: When My servant draws close to Me by the span of a palm, I draw close to him by the cubit and when he draws close to Me by the cubit, I draw close to him by the space (covered) by two hands, and when he draws close to Me by the space (covered) by two hands, I go in hurry towards him.
[6497]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Mu'tamar from his father with the same chain of transmitters, with a slight variation of wording.
[6498]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying that Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, thus stated: I live in the thought of My servant as he thinks about Me, and I am with him, as he remembers Me And if he remembers Me in his heart, I also remember him in My Heart, and if he remembers Me in assembly I remember him in the assembly, better than he (does that), and if he draws near Me by the span of a palm I draw near him by the cubit, and if he draws near Me by the cubit I draw near him by the space (covered by) two hands. And it he walks towards Me, I rush towards him.
[6499]
Abu Dharr reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying that Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, stated: "He who comes with goodness, there are in store for him ten like those and even more than those: 'And he who comes with vice,' it is only for that that he is called to account. I even forgive him (as I like) and he who draws close to Me by the span of a palm I draw close to him by the cubit, and he who draws close to Me by the cubit I draw close to him by the space (covered) by two hands, and he who walks towards Me I rush towards him, and he who meets Me in the state that his sins fill the earth, but not associating anything with Me, I would meet Him with the same (vastness) of pardon (on My behalf)." This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Waki'.
[6500]
A hadith like this has been transmitted on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmitters and he (further) said: There is for him ten like that (the good he performed) or more than that.